Texas statutes.
TRANSPORTATION CODE

TITLE 7. VEHICLES AND TRAFFIC

SUBTITLE A. CERTIFICATES OF TITLE AND REGISTRATION OF VEHICLES

CHAPTER 502. REGISTRATION OF VEHICLES

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 502.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) Repealed by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1233 (H.B. 1548), Sec. 41(3), eff. June 14, 2019.

(2) "Apportioned license plate" means a license plate issued in lieu of a truck, motor bus, or combination license plate to a motor carrier in this state who proportionally registers a vehicle owned or leased by the carrier in one or more other states.

(3) "Board" means the board of the Texas Department of Motor Vehicles.

(4) "Combination license plate" means a license plate issued for a truck or truck-tractor that is used or intended to be used in combination with a semitrailer that has a gross weight of more than 6,000 pounds.

(5) "Combined gross weight" means the empty weight of the truck-tractor or commercial motor vehicle combined with the empty weight of the heaviest semitrailer used or to be used in combination with the truck-tractor or commercial motor vehicle plus the heaviest net load to be carried on the combination during the registration year.

(6) "Commercial fleet" means a group of at least 12 nonapportioned motor vehicles, semitrailers, or trailers owned, operated, or leased by a corporation, limited or general partnership, limited liability company, or other business entity and used for the business purposes of that entity.

(7) "Commercial motor vehicle" means a motor vehicle, other than a motorcycle or moped, designed or used primarily to transport property. The term includes a passenger car reconstructed and used primarily for delivery purposes. The term does not include a passenger car used to deliver the United States mail.

(8) "Construction machinery" means a vehicle that:

(A) is used for construction;

(B) is built from the ground up;

(C) is not mounted or affixed to another vehicle such as a trailer;

(D) was originally and permanently designed as machinery;

(E) was not in any way originally designed to transport persons or property; and

(F) does not carry a load, including fuel.

(9) "Credit card" has the meaning assigned by Section 501.002.

(10) "Debit card" has the meaning assigned by Section 501.002.

(11) "Department" means the Texas Department of Motor Vehicles.

(12) Repealed by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 485 (H.B. 2188), Sec. 10, eff. September 1, 2019.

(13) "Electric personal assistive mobility device" has the meaning assigned by Section 551.201.

(14) "Empty weight" means the unladen weight of a truck-tractor or commercial motor vehicle and semitrailer combination fully equipped, as certified by a public weigher or license and weight inspector of the Department of Public Safety.

(15) "Farm semitrailer" or "farm trailer" means a vehicle designed and used primarily as a farm vehicle.

(16) "Farm tractor" has the meaning assigned by Section 541.201.

(17) "Forestry vehicle" means a vehicle designed and used exclusively for transporting forest products in their natural state, including logs, debarked logs, untreated ties, stave bolts, plywood bolts, pulpwood billets, wood chips, stumps, sawdust, moss, bark, and wood shavings, and property used in production of those products.

(17-a) "Former military vehicle" means a vehicle, including a trailer, that:

(A) was manufactured for use in any country's military forces; and

(B) is not operated on continuous tracks.

(18) Repealed by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1233 (H.B. 1548), Sec. 41(3), eff. June 14, 2019.

(19) "Gross vehicle weight" has the meaning assigned by Section 541.401.

(20) "Implements of husbandry" has the meaning assigned by Section 541.201.

(21) "Light truck" has the meaning assigned by Section 541.201.

(22) "Moped" has the meaning assigned by Section 541.201.

(23) "Motor bus" includes every vehicle used to transport persons on the public highways for compensation, other than:

(A) a vehicle operated by muscular power; or

(B) a municipal bus.

(24) "Motorcycle" has the meaning assigned by Section 521.001 or 541.201, as applicable.

(25) "Motor vehicle" means a vehicle that is self-propelled.

(26) "Motorized mobility device" has the meaning assigned by Section 552A.0101.

(27) "Municipal bus" includes every vehicle, other than a passenger car, used to transport persons for compensation exclusively within the limits of a municipality or a suburban addition to the municipality.

(28) "Net carrying capacity" means the heaviest net load that is able to be carried on a vehicle, but not less than the manufacturer's rated carrying capacity.

(29) "Oil well servicing, cleanout, or drilling machinery":

(A) has the meaning assigned by Section 623.149; or

(B) means a mobile crane:

(i) that is an unladen, self-propelled vehicle constructed as a machine and used solely to raise, shift, or lower heavy weights by means of a projecting, swinging mast with an engine for power on a chassis permanently constructed or assembled for that purpose; and

(ii) for which the owner has secured a permit from the department under Section 623.142.

(30) "Operate temporarily on the highways" means to travel between:

(A) different farms;

(B) a place of supply or storage and a farm; or

(C) an owner's farm and the place at which the owner's farm produce is prepared for market or is marketed.

(31) "Owner" means a person who:

(A) holds the legal title of a vehicle;

(B) has the legal right of possession of a vehicle; or

(C) has the legal right of control of a vehicle.

(32) "Passenger car" has the meaning assigned by Section 541.201.

(33) "Power sweeper" means an implement, with or without motive power, designed for the removal by a broom, vacuum, or regenerative air system of debris, dirt, gravel, litter, or sand from asphaltic concrete or cement concrete surfaces, including surfaces of parking lots, roads, streets, highways, and warehouse floors. The term includes a vehicle on which the implement is permanently mounted if the vehicle is used only as a power sweeper.

(34) "Private bus" means a bus that:

(A) is not operated for hire; and

(B) is not a municipal bus or a motor bus.

(35) "Public highway" includes a road, street, way, thoroughfare, or bridge:

(A) that is in this state;

(B) that is for the use of vehicles;

(C) that is not privately owned or controlled; and

(D) over which the state has legislative jurisdiction under its police power.

(36) "Public property" means property owned or leased by this state or a political subdivision of this state.

(37) Repealed by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1233 (H.B. 1548), Sec. 41(3), eff. June 14, 2019.

(38) "Road tractor" means a vehicle designed for the purpose of mowing the right-of-way of a public highway or a motor vehicle designed or used for drawing another vehicle or a load and not constructed to carry:

(A) an independent load; or

(B) a part of the weight of the vehicle and load to be drawn.

(39) "Semitrailer" means a vehicle designed or used with a motor vehicle so that part of the weight of the vehicle and its load rests on or is carried by another vehicle.

(39-a) "Shipping weight" means the weight generally accepted as the empty weight of a vehicle.

(40) "Token trailer" means a semitrailer that:

(A) has a gross weight of more than 6,000 pounds; and

(B) is operated in combination with a truck or a truck-tractor that has been issued:

(i) an apportioned license plate;

(ii) a combination license plate; or

(iii) a forestry vehicle license plate.

(41) "Tow truck" means a motor vehicle adapted or used to tow, winch, or otherwise move another motor vehicle.

(42) "Trailer" means a vehicle that:

(A) is designed or used to carry a load wholly on its own structure; and

(B) is drawn or designed to be drawn by a motor vehicle.

(43) "Travel trailer" has the meaning assigned by Section 501.002.

(44) "Truck-tractor" means a motor vehicle:

(A) designed and used primarily for drawing another vehicle; and

(B) not constructed to carry a load other than a part of the weight of the vehicle and load to be drawn.

(45) "Vehicle" means a device in or by which a person or property is or may be transported or drawn on a public highway, other than a device used exclusively on stationary rails or tracks.

Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 625, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 586 (H.B. 1646), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1280 (H.B. 3849), Sec. 1, eff. June 15, 2007.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 933 (H.B. 3097), Sec. 2E.01, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1136 (H.B. 2553), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1173 (H.B. 3433), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1232 (S.B. 1759), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 71, eff. January 1, 2012.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 131 (S.B. 487), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1135 (H.B. 2741), Sec. 62, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 968 (S.B. 2075), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 485 (H.B. 2188), Sec. 10, eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 612 (S.B. 969), Sec. 1, eff. June 10, 2019.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 882 (H.B. 3171), Sec. 2.03, eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1079 (H.B. 1755), Sec. 6, eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1233 (H.B. 1548), Sec. 41(3), eff. June 14, 2019.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 388 (H.B. 433), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 502.0021. RULES AND FORMS. (a) The department may adopt rules to administer this chapter.

(b) The department shall post forms on the Internet and provide each county assessor-collector with a sufficient supply of any necessary forms on request.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 625, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Renumbered from Sec. 502.009 by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 62, Sec. 19.01(100), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 72, eff. January 1, 2012.

Sec. 502.00211. DESIGN OF REGISTRATION INSIGNIA. The department shall prepare the designs and specifications to be used as the registration insignia.

Transferred, redesignated and amended from Transportation Code, Section 502.052 by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 73, eff. January 1, 2012.

Sec. 502.0023. EXTENDED REGISTRATION OF COMMERCIAL FLEET VEHICLES. (a) Notwithstanding Section 502.044(c), the department shall develop and implement a system of registration to allow an owner of a commercial fleet to register the motor vehicles, semitrailers, and trailers in the commercial fleet for an extended registration period of not less than one year or more than eight years. The owner may select the number of years for registration under this section within that range and register the commercial fleet for that period. Payment for all registration fees for the entire registration period selected is due at the time of registration.

(b) A system of extended registration under this section must allow the owner of a commercial fleet to register an entire commercial fleet in the county of the owner's residence or principal place of business or in any county in which the county assessor-collector is willing to accept the registration.

(c) In addition to the registration fees prescribed by this chapter, an owner registering a commercial fleet under this section shall pay:

(1) a one-time fee of $10 per motor vehicle, semitrailer, or trailer in the fleet; and

(2) except as provided by Subsection (e), a one-time license plate manufacturing fee of $1.50 for each fleet motor vehicle, semitrailer, or trailer license plate.

(c-1) A fee collected under Subsection (c) shall be deposited to the credit of the Texas Department of Motor Vehicles fund.

(d) A license plate issued under this section:

(1) may, on request of the owner, include the name or logo of the business entity that owns the vehicle;

(2) except as provided by Subsection (d-1), must include the expiration date of the registration period; and

(3) does not require an annual registration insignia to be valid.

(d-1) The department shall issue a license plate for a token trailer registered under this section that does not expire. The alphanumeric pattern for a license plate issued under this subsection may remain on a token trailer for as long as the registration of the token trailer is renewed or until the token trailer is removed from service or sold. The registration receipt required under Section 621.002 is not required for a vehicle that displays a license plate issued under this subsection.

(e) In addition to all other applicable registration fees, an owner registering a commercial fleet under this section shall pay a one-time license plate manufacturing fee of $8 for each set of plates issued that includes on the legend the name or logo of the business entity that owns the vehicle instead of the fee imposed by Subsection (c)(2). A license plate manufacturing fee collected under this section shall be deposited to the credit of the Texas Department of Motor Vehicles fund.

(f) If a motor vehicle registered under this section has a gross weight in excess of 10,000 pounds, the department shall also issue a registration card for the vehicle that is valid for the selected registration period.

(g) The department shall adopt rules to implement this section, including rules on suspension from the commercial fleet program for failure to comply with this section or rules adopted under this section.

(h) The department and the counties in their budgeting processes shall consider any temporary increases and resulting decreases in revenue that will result from the use of the process provided under this section.

(i) The department may provide for credits for fleet registration.

(j) A motor vehicle, semitrailer, or trailer registered under this section is subject to the inspection requirements of Chapter 548 as if the vehicle, semitrailer, or trailer were registered without extended registration. The department and the Department of Public Safety shall by rule establish a method to enforce the inspection requirements of Chapter 548 for motor vehicles, semitrailers, and trailers registered under this section. The department may assess a fee to cover the department's administrative costs of implementing this subsection.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1173 (H.B. 3433), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2009.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1232 (S.B. 1759), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2009.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 74, eff. January 1, 2012.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 75, eff. January 1, 2012.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 252 (H.B. 511), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1291 (H.B. 2305), Sec. 11, eff. March 1, 2015.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 968 (S.B. 2075), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 592 (S.B. 876), Sec. 4, eff. March 1, 2022.

Text of section effective until January 01, 2025

Sec. 502.0024. EXTENDED REGISTRATION OF CERTAIN VEHICLES NOT SUBJECT TO INSPECTION. (a) Notwithstanding Section 502.044(c), the department shall develop and implement a system of registration to allow an owner of a vehicle described by Section 548.052(3) other than a mobile home to register the vehicle for an extended registration period of not more than five years. The owner may select the number of years for registration under this section within that range and register the vehicle for that period. Payment for all applicable fees, including any optional fee imposed under Subchapter H and other registration fees and the fee required by Section 548.510, for the entire registration period selected is due at the time of registration.

(b) The fee required by Section 548.510 shall be remitted to the comptroller for deposit in the Texas mobility fund, the general revenue fund, and the clean air account in amounts proportionate to the allocation prescribed by Subsection (b) of that section.

(c) The fees imposed under Subchapter H shall be collected and remitted as prescribed by that subchapter.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 456 (H.B. 1262), Sec. 1, eff. June 5, 2019.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 851 (H.B. 3297), Sec. 4, eff. January 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on January 01, 2025

Sec. 502.0024. EXTENDED REGISTRATION OF CERTAIN TRAILERS. (a) Notwithstanding Section 502.044(c), the department shall develop and implement a system of registration to allow an owner of a trailer, semitrailer, or pole trailer having an actual gross weight or registered gross weight of 7,500 pounds or less to register the vehicle for an extended registration period of not more than five years. The owner may select the number of years for registration under this section within that range and register the vehicle for that period. Payment for all applicable fees, including any optional fee imposed under Subchapter H and other registration fees and the fee required by Section 548.510, for the entire registration period selected is due at the time of registration.

(b) The fee required by Section 548.510 shall be remitted to the comptroller for deposit in the Texas mobility fund, the general revenue fund, and the clean air account in amounts proportionate to the allocation prescribed by Subsection (d) of that section.

(c) The fees imposed under Subchapter H shall be collected and remitted as prescribed by that subchapter.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 456 (H.B. 1262), Sec. 1, eff. June 5, 2019.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 851 (H.B. 3297), Sec. 4, eff. January 1, 2025.

Sec. 502.0025. EXTENDED REGISTRATION OF CERTAIN COUNTY FLEET VEHICLES. (a) In this section, "exempt county fleet" means a group of two or more nonapportioned motor vehicles, semitrailers, or trailers described by Section 502.453(a) that is owned by and used exclusively in the service of a county with a population of 3.3 million or more.

(b) Notwithstanding the annual registration requirements of Sections 502.044(c) and 502.453(a), the department shall develop and implement a system of registration to allow an owner of an exempt county fleet to register vehicles in the fleet for an extended registration period of not less than one year or more than eight years.

(c) A system of extended registration under this section must allow the owner of an exempt county fleet to:

(1) select the number of years for registration under this section;

(2) register the entire fleet in the county of the owner's principal place of business;

(3) register the motor vehicles in the fleet that are operated most regularly in the same county; or

(4) register the entire fleet directly with the department.

Text of subsection effective until January 01, 2025

(d) A motor vehicle, semitrailer, or trailer registered under this section is subject to the inspection requirements of Chapter 548 as if the vehicle, semitrailer, or trailer were registered without an extended registration period.

Text of subsection effective on January 01, 2025

(d) A motor vehicle, semitrailer, or trailer registered under this section is subject to any applicable inspection requirements of Chapter 548 as if the vehicle, semitrailer, or trailer were registered without an extended registration period.

Text of subsection effective until January 01, 2025

(e) The department shall adopt rules to implement this section, including rules:

(1) regarding the suspension of an exempt county fleet's registration under this section if the owner of the exempt county fleet fails to comply with this section or rules adopted under this section; and

(2) establishing a method to enforce the inspection requirements of Chapter 548 for motor vehicles, semitrailers, and trailers registered under this section.

Text of subsection effective on January 01, 2025

(e) The department shall adopt rules to implement this section, including rules:

(1) regarding the suspension of an exempt county fleet's registration under this section if the owner of the exempt county fleet fails to comply with this section or rules adopted under this section; and

(2) establishing a method to enforce applicable inspection requirements of Chapter 548 for motor vehicles, semitrailers, and trailers registered under this section.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 56 (S.B. 1064), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2021.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 851 (H.B. 3297), Sec. 5, eff. January 1, 2025.

Sec. 502.0026. EXTENDED REGISTRATION OF CERTAIN RENTAL VEHICLES. (a) Notwithstanding Section 502.044, the initial registration period is three years for a passenger car or light truck:

(1) that is sold in this state or purchased by a commercial fleet buyer described by Section 501.0234(b)(4) for use in this state;

(2) that has not been previously registered in this or another state;

(3) that on the date of sale is of the current or preceding model year; and

(4) for which a rental certificate has been furnished as described by Section 152.061(b), Tax Code.

(b) Payment for all applicable fees, including any optional fee imposed under Subchapter H and other registration fees and the fee required by Section 548.5035, for the entire registration period is due at the time of registration.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 362 (S.B. 2102), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 502.003. REGISTRATION BY POLITICAL SUBDIVISION PROHIBITED. (a) Except as provided by Subsection (b), a political subdivision of this state may not require an owner of a motor vehicle to:

(1) register the vehicle;

(2) pay a motor vehicle registration fee; or

(3) pay an occupation tax or license fee in connection with a motor vehicle.

(b) This section does not affect the authority of a municipality to:

(1) license and regulate the use of motor vehicles for compensation within the municipal limits; and

(2) impose a permit fee or street rental charge for the operation of each motor vehicle used to transport passengers for compensation, other than a motor vehicle operating under a registration certificate from the department or a permit from the federal Surface Transportation Board.

(c) A fee or charge under Subsection (b) may not exceed two percent of the annual gross receipts from the vehicle.

(d) This section does not impair the payment provisions of an agreement or franchise between a municipality and the owners or operators of motor vehicles used to transport passengers for compensation.

Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 30.45, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 502.004. INFORMATION ON ALTERNATIVELY FUELED VEHICLES. (a) In this section, "alternatively fueled vehicle" means a motor vehicle that is capable of using a fuel other than gasoline or diesel fuel.

(b) The department by rule shall establish a program to collect information about the number of alternatively fueled vehicles registered in this state.

(c) The department shall submit an annual report to the legislature that includes the information collected under this section. The report must, at a minimum, show the number of vehicles registered in this state that use:

(1) electric plug-in drives;

(2) hybrid electric drives;

(3) compressed natural gas drives; and

(4) liquefied natural gas drives.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 507 (H.B. 735), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2016.

Sec. 502.005. REGISTRATION OF AUTOCYCLE. (a) In this section, "autocycle" means a motor vehicle, other than a tractor, that is:

(1) designed to have when propelled not more than three wheels on the ground;

(2) equipped with seat belts and a steering mechanism;

(3) equipped with seating that does not require the operator to straddle or sit astride the seat; and

(4) manufactured and certified to comply with federal safety requirements for a motorcycle.

(b) For purposes of registering a vehicle under this chapter, an autocycle is considered to be a motorcycle.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 67 (S.B. 449), Sec. 2, eff. May 22, 2015.

Redesignated from Transportation Code, Section 502.004 by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 324 (S.B. 1488), Sec. 24.001(50), eff. September 1, 2017.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 34 (S.B. 1115), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 502.010. COUNTY SCOFFLAW. (a) Except as otherwise provided by this section, a county assessor-collector or the department may refuse to register a motor vehicle if the assessor-collector or the department receives information that the owner of the vehicle:

(1) owes the county money for a fine, fee, or tax that is past due; or

(2) failed to appear in connection with a complaint, citation, information, or indictment in a court in the county in which a criminal proceeding is pending against the owner.

(b) A county may contract with the department to provide information to the department necessary to make a determination under Subsection (a).

(b-1) Information that is provided to make a determination under Subsection (a)(1) and that concerns the past due status of a fine or fee imposed for a criminal offense and owed to the county expires on the second anniversary of the date the information was provided and may not be used to refuse registration after that date. Once information about a past due fine or fee is provided under Subsection (b), subsequent information about other fines or fees that are imposed for a criminal offense and that become past due before the second anniversary of the date the initial information was provided may not be used, either before or after the second anniversary of that date, to refuse registration under this section unless the motor vehicle is no longer subject to refusal of registration because of notice received under Subsection (c).

(c) A county that has a contract under Subsection (b) shall notify the department regarding a person for whom the county assessor-collector or the department has refused to register a motor vehicle on:

(1) the person's payment or other means of discharge, including a waiver, of the past due fine, fee, or tax; or

(2) perfection of an appeal of the case contesting payment of the fine, fee, or tax.

(d) After notice is received under Subsection (c), the county assessor-collector or the department may not refuse to register the motor vehicle under Subsection (a).

(e) A contract under Subsection (b) must be entered into in accordance with Chapter 791, Government Code, and is subject to the ability of the parties to provide or pay for the services required under the contract.

(f) Except as otherwise provided by this section, a county that has a contract under Subsection (b) may impose an additional reimbursement fee of $20 to:

(1) a person who fails to pay a fine, fee, or tax to the county by the date on which the fine, fee, or tax is due; or

(2) a person who fails to appear in connection with a complaint, citation, information, or indictment in a court in which a criminal proceeding is pending against the owner.

(f-1) The additional reimbursement fee may be used only to reimburse the department or the county assessor-collector for its expenses for providing services under the contract, or another county department for expenses related to services under the contract.

(g) In this section:

(1) a fine, fee, or tax is considered past due if it is unpaid 90 or more days after the date it is due; and

(2) registration of a motor vehicle includes renewal of the registration of the vehicle.

(h) This section does not apply to the registration of a motor vehicle under Section 501.0234, unless the vehicle is titled and registered in the name of a person who holds a general distinguishing number.

(i) A municipal court judge or justice of the peace who has jurisdiction over the underlying offense may waive an additional reimbursement fee imposed under Subsection (f) if the judge or justice makes a finding that the defendant is economically unable to pay the fee or that good cause exists for the waiver.

(j) If a county assessor-collector is notified that the court having jurisdiction over the underlying offense has waived the past due fine or fee, including a reimbursement fee, due to the defendant's indigency, the county may not impose an additional reimbursement fee on the defendant under Subsection (f).

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 192, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 97, Sec. 1, eff. May 17, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1094 (S.B. 1386), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2011.

Transferred, redesignated and amended from Transportation Code, Section 502.185 by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 76, eff. January 1, 2012.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 977 (H.B. 351), Sec. 26, eff. September 1, 2017.

Reenacted and amended by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 977 (H.B. 351), Sec. 27, eff. September 1, 2017.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1127 (S.B. 1913), Sec. 23, eff. September 1, 2017.

Reenacted and amended by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1127 (S.B. 1913), Sec. 24, eff. September 1, 2017.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1352 (S.B. 346), Sec. 2.61, eff. January 1, 2020.

Sec. 502.011. REFUSAL TO REGISTER VEHICLE FOR NONPAYMENT OF TOLL OR ADMINISTRATIVE FEE. (a) A county assessor-collector or the department may refuse to register or renew the registration of a motor vehicle if it has received written notice from a toll project entity that the owner of the vehicle has been finally determined to be a habitual violator under Subchapter C, Chapter 372.

(b) A toll project entity shall notify a county assessor-collector or the department, as applicable, that:

(1) a person for whom the assessor-collector or the department has refused to register a vehicle is no longer determined to be a habitual violator; or

(2) an appeal has been perfected and the appellant has posted any bond required to stay the toll project entity's exercise of habitual violator remedies pending the appeal.

(c) This section does not apply to the registration of a motor vehicle under Section 501.0234.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 491 (S.B. 1792), Sec. 2, eff. June 14, 2013.

Sec. 502.012. NOTICE REGARDING WHETHER CERTAIN TRAILERS ARE SUBJECT TO INSPECTION. The department shall include in each registration renewal notice for a vehicle that is a trailer, semitrailer, or pole trailer a statement regarding whether the vehicle is subject to inspection under Chapter 548.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 721 (S.B. 1001), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2017.

SUBCHAPTER B. REGISTRATION REQUIREMENTS

Sec. 502.040. REGISTRATION REQUIRED; GENERAL RULE. (a) Not more than 30 days after purchasing a vehicle or becoming a resident of this state, the owner of a motor vehicle, trailer, or semitrailer shall apply for the registration of the vehicle for:

(1) each registration year in which the vehicle is used or to be used on a public highway; and

(2) if the vehicle is unregistered for a registration year that has begun and that applies to the vehicle and if the vehicle is used or to be used on a public highway, the remaining portion of that registration year.

(b) The application must be accompanied by personal identification as determined by department rule and made in a manner prescribed by the department through:

(1) the county assessor-collector of the county in which the owner resides; or

(2) any county assessor-collector who is willing to accept the application.

(c) A provision of this chapter that conflicts with this section prevails over this section to the extent of the conflict.

(d) A county assessor-collector, a deputy county assessor-collector, or a person acting on behalf of a county assessor-collector is not liable to any person for:

(1) refusing to register a vehicle because of the person's failure to submit evidence of residency that complies with the department's rules; or

(2) registering a vehicle under this section.

Transferred, redesignated and amended from Transportation Code, Section 502.002 by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 78, eff. January 1, 2012.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1135 (H.B. 2741), Sec. 63, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 968 (S.B. 2075), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 592 (S.B. 876), Sec. 5, eff. March 1, 2022.

Sec. 502.041. INITIAL REGISTRATION. (a) Notwithstanding Section 502.040, the owner of a vehicle may concurrently apply for a title and for registration through the county assessor-collector of the county in which:

(1) the owner resides;

(2) the vehicle is purchased or encumbered; or

(3) the county assessor-collector is willing to accept the application.

(b) The first time an owner applies for registration of a vehicle, the owner may demonstrate compliance with Section 502.046(a) as to the vehicle by showing proof of financial responsibility in any manner specified in Section 502.046(c) as to:

(1) any vehicle of the owner; or

(2) any vehicle used as part of the consideration for the purchase of the vehicle the owner applies to register.

Transferred, redesignated and amended from Transportation Code, Section 502.157 by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 79, eff. January 1, 2012.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 592 (S.B. 876), Sec. 6, eff. March 1, 2022.

Sec. 502.042. TITLE REQUIRED FOR REGISTRATION. The department may not register or renew the registration of a motor vehicle for which a title is required under Chapter 501 unless the owner:

(1) obtains a title for the vehicle; or

(2) presents satisfactory evidence that a title was previously issued to the owner by the department or another jurisdiction.

Transferred, redesignated and amended from Transportation Code, Section 502.152 by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 80, eff. January 1, 2012.

Sec. 502.043. APPLICATION FOR REGISTRATION AND CERTAIN PERMITS. (a) An application for vehicle registration or a permit described by Section 502.094 or 502.095 must:

(1) be made in a manner prescribed and include the information required by the department by rule; and

(2) contain a full description of the vehicle as required by department rule.

(b) The department shall deny the registration of or permitting under Section 502.094 or 502.095 of a commercial motor vehicle, truck-tractor, trailer, or semitrailer if the applicant:

(1) has a business operated, managed, or otherwise controlled or affiliated with a person who is ineligible for registration or whose privilege to operate has been suspended, including the applicant entity, a relative, family member, corporate officer, or shareholder;

(2) has a vehicle that has been prohibited from operating by the Federal Motor Carrier Safety Administration for safety-related reasons;

(3) is a carrier whose business is operated, managed, or otherwise controlled or affiliated with a person who is ineligible for registration, including the owner, a relative, a family member, a corporate officer, or a shareholder; or

(4) fails to deliver to the county assessor-collector proof of the weight of the vehicle, the maximum load to be carried on the vehicle, and the gross weight for which the vehicle is to be registered.

(c) In lieu of filing an application during a year as provided by Subsection (a), the owner of a vehicle registered in any state for that year or the preceding year may present:

(1) the registration receipt and transfer receipt for the vehicle; or

(2) other evidence satisfactory to the county assessor-collector that the person owns the vehicle.

(c-1) A county assessor-collector shall accept a receipt or evidence provided under Subsection (c) as an application for renewal of the registration if the receipt or evidence indicates the applicant owns the vehicle. This section allows issuance for registration purposes only but does not authorize the department to issue a title.

(d) The department may require an applicant for registration to provide current personal identification as determined by department rule. Any identification number required by the department under this subsection may be entered into the department's electronic titling system but may not be printed on the title.

Transferred, redesignated and amended from Transportation Code, Section 502.151 by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 81, eff. January 1, 2012.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1135 (H.B. 2741), Sec. 64, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1135 (H.B. 2741), Sec. 65, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 502.0435. ONLINE REGISTRATION RENEWAL. If a person is otherwise eligible to renew a vehicle registration under this chapter, the person may renew the vehicle registration through an online registration system maintained by the department.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 207 (H.B. 2152), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 502.044. REGISTRATION PERIOD. (a) The department shall designate a vehicle registration year of 12 consecutive months to begin on the first day of a calendar month and end on the last day of the 12th calendar month.

(b) The department shall designate vehicle registration years so as to distribute the work of the department and the county assessor-collectors as uniformly as possible throughout the year. The department may establish separate registration years for any vehicle or classification of vehicle and may adopt rules to administer the year-round registration system.

(c) The department may designate a registration period of less than 12 months to be computed at a rate of one-twelfth the annual registration fee multiplied by the number of months in the registration period. The board by rule may allow payment of registration fees for a designated period not to exceed the amount of time determined by department rule.

(d) The department shall issue a registration receipt and registration insignia that are valid until the expiration of the designated period.

(e) The department shall use the date of sale of the vehicle in designating the registration year for a vehicle for which registration is applied for under Section 501.0234.

Transferred, redesignated and amended from Transportation Code, Section 502.158 by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 82, eff. January 1, 2012.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 696 (H.B. 2874), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 502.045. DELINQUENT REGISTRATION. (a) A registration fee for a vehicle becomes delinquent immediately if the vehicle is used on a public highway without the fee having been paid in accordance with this chapter.

(b) An applicant for registration who provides evidence to establish good reason for delinquent registration and who complies with the other requirements for registration under this chapter may register the vehicle for a 12-month period that ends on the last day of the 11th month after the month in which the registration occurs under this subsection.

(c) An applicant for registration who is delinquent and has not provided evidence acceptable to establish good reason for delinquent registration but who complies with the other requirements for registration under this chapter shall register the vehicle for a 12-month period without changing the initial month of registration.

(d) A person who has been arrested or received a citation for a violation of Section 502.472 may register the vehicle being operated at the time of the offense for a 12-month period without change to the initial month of registration only if the person:

(1) meets the other requirements for registration under this chapter; and

(2) pays an additional charge equal to 20 percent of the prescribed fee.

(e) The board by rule shall adopt a list of evidentiary items sufficient to establish good reason for delinquent registration under Subsection (b) and provide for the evidence that may be used to establish good reason under that subsection.

(f) The board by rule shall adopt procedures to implement this section in connection with the delinquent registration of a vehicle registered directly with the department or through other means.

Transferred, redesignated and amended from Transportation Code, Section 502.176 by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 83, eff. January 1, 2012.

Sec. 502.046. EVIDENCE OF FINANCIAL RESPONSIBILITY. (a) Evidence of financial responsibility as required by Section 601.051 other than for a trailer or semitrailer shall be submitted with the application for registration under Section 502.043. A county assessor-collector may not register the motor vehicle unless the owner or the owner's representative submits the evidence of financial responsibility.

(b) The county assessor-collector shall examine the evidence of financial responsibility to determine whether it complies with Subsection (c). After examination, the evidence shall be returned unless it is in the form of a photocopy or an electronic submission.

(c) In this section, evidence of financial responsibility may be:

(1) a document listed under Section 601.053(a) or verified in compliance with Section 601.452;

(2) a liability self-insurance or pool coverage document issued by a political subdivision or governmental pool under the authority of Chapter 791, Government Code, Chapter 119, Local Government Code, or other applicable law in at least the minimum amounts required by Chapter 601;

(3) a photocopy of a document described by Subdivision (1) or (2); or

(4) an electronic submission of a document or the information contained in a document described by Subdivision (1) or (2).

(d) A personal automobile policy used as evidence of financial responsibility under this section must comply with Section 1952.052 et seq. and Sections 2301.051 through 2301.055, Insurance Code.

(e) At the time of registration, the county assessor-collector shall provide to a person registering a motor vehicle a statement that the motor vehicle may not be operated in this state unless:

(1) liability insurance coverage for the motor vehicle in at least the minimum amounts required by law remains in effect to insure against potential losses; or

(2) the motor vehicle is exempt from the insurance requirement because the person has established financial responsibility in a manner described by Sections 601.051(2)-(5) or is exempt under Section 601.052.

(f) A county assessor-collector is not liable to any person for refusing to register a motor vehicle to which this section applies because of the person's failure to submit evidence of financial responsibility that complies with Subsection (c).

(g) A county, a county assessor-collector, a deputy county assessor-collector, a person acting for or on behalf of a county or a county assessor-collector, or a person acting on behalf of an owner for purposes of registering a motor vehicle is not liable to any person for registering a motor vehicle under this section.

(h) This section does not prevent a person from registering a motor vehicle by mail or through an electronic submission.

(i) To be valid under this section, an electronic submission must be in a format that is:

(1) submitted by electronic means, including a telephone, facsimile machine, or computer;

(2) approved by the department; and

(3) authorized by the commissioners court for use in the county.

(j) This section does not apply to a vehicle registered pursuant to Section 501.0234.

Transferred, redesignated and amended from Transportation Code, Section 502.153 by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 84, eff. January 1, 2012.

Sec. 502.047. REGISTRATION-BASED ENFORCEMENT OF MOTOR VEHICLE INSPECTION REQUIREMENTS.

Text of subsection effective until January 01, 2025

(a) Except as provided by Chapter 548, the department and the Department of Public Safety shall ensure compliance with the motor vehicle inspection requirements under Chapter 548, including compliance with the motor vehicle emissions inspection and maintenance program under Subchapter F of that chapter, through a vehicle registration-based enforcement system.

Text of subsection effective on January 01, 2025

(a) Except as provided by Chapter 548, the department and the Department of Public Safety shall ensure compliance with motor vehicle inspection requirements under Chapter 548 through a vehicle registration-based enforcement system.

(b) A motor vehicle may not be registered if the department receives from the Texas Commission on Environmental Quality or the Department of Public Safety notification that the registered owner of the vehicle has not complied with Chapter 548.

(c) A motor vehicle may not be registered if the vehicle was denied registration under Subsection (b) unless verification is received that the registered vehicle owner is in compliance with Chapter 548.

(d) The department and the Department of Public Safety shall enter into an agreement regarding the timely submission by the Department of Public Safety of inspection compliance information to the department.

(d-1) The department, the Texas Commission on Environmental Quality, and the Department of Public Safety shall enter an agreement regarding the responsibilities for costs associated with implementing this section.

(e) A county tax assessor-collector is not liable to any person for refusing to register a motor vehicle because of the person's failure to provide verification of the person's compliance with Chapter 548.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1069, Sec. 3, eff. June 19, 1997. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1075, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Transferred, redesignated and amended from Transportation Code, Section 502.009 by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 85, eff. January 1, 2012.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1291 (H.B. 2305), Sec. 12, eff. March 1, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 752 (H.B. 1888), Sec. 1, eff. January 1, 2016.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 851 (H.B. 3297), Sec. 6, eff. January 1, 2025.

Sec. 502.048. REFUSAL TO REGISTER UNSAFE VEHICLE. The department may refuse to register a motor vehicle and may cancel, suspend, or revoke a registration if the department determines that a motor vehicle is unsafe, improperly equipped, or otherwise unfit to be operated on a public highway.

Transferred, redesignated and amended from Transportation Code, Section 502.005 by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 86, eff. January 1, 2012.

Sec. 502.055. DETERMINATION OF WEIGHT AND SEATING CAPACITY. (a) The weight, net weight, or gross weight of a vehicle, as determined by the department, is the correct weight for registration purposes, regardless of any other purported weight of the vehicle.

(b) The department may require an applicant for registration under this chapter to provide the department with evidence of:

(1) the manufacturer's rated carrying capacity for the vehicle; or

(2) the gross vehicle weight rating.

(c) For the purposes of this section, the seating capacity of a bus is:

(1) the manufacturer's rated seating capacity, excluding the operator's seat; or

(2) if the manufacturer has not rated the vehicle for seating capacity, a number computed by allowing one passenger for each 16 inches of seating on the bus, excluding the operator's seat.

(d) For registration purposes:

(1) the weight of a passenger car is the shipping weight of the car plus 100 pounds; and

(2) the weight of a municipal bus or private bus is calculated by adding the following and rounding to the next highest 100 pounds:

(A) the shipping weight of the bus; and

(B) the seating capacity multiplied by 150 pounds.

Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 625, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 87, eff. January 1, 2012.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1135 (H.B. 2741), Sec. 66, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1135 (H.B. 2741), Sec. 67, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 502.056. DISPUTED CLASSIFICATION OF VEHICLE. In a disputed case, the department may determine:

(1) the classification to which a vehicle belongs; and

(2) the amount of the registration fee for the vehicle.

Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 502.057. REGISTRATION RECEIPT. (a) The department shall issue or require to be issued to the owner of a vehicle registered under this chapter a registration receipt showing the information required by rule.

(b) A receipt for the renewed registration of a vehicle generated by an online registration system approved by the department is proof of the vehicle's registration until the 31st day after the date of renewal on the receipt.

Transferred, redesignated and amended from Transportation Code, Section 502.178 by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 88, eff. January 1, 2012.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 968 (S.B. 2075), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 502.058. DUPLICATE REGISTRATION RECEIPT. (a) The owner of a vehicle for which the registration receipt has been lost or destroyed may obtain a duplicate receipt from the department or the county assessor-collector who issued the original receipt by paying a fee of $2.

(b) The office issuing a duplicate receipt shall retain the fee received.

(c) A fee collected by the department under Subsection (a) shall be deposited to the credit of the Texas Department of Motor Vehicles fund.

Transferred, redesignated and amended from Transportation Code, Section 502.179 by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 89, eff. January 1, 2012.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1287 (H.B. 2202), Sec. 14, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 502.059. ISSUANCE OF REGISTRATION INSIGNIA. (a) On payment of the prescribed fee an applicant for motor vehicle registration shall be issued a registration insignia.

(b) On application and payment of the prescribed fee for a renewal of the registration of a vehicle through the period set by rule, the department shall issue a registration insignia for the validation of the license plate or plates to be attached as provided by Subsection (c).

(c) Except as provided by Subsection (f), the registration insignia for validation of a license plate shall be attached to the inside of the vehicle's windshield, if the vehicle has a windshield, in the lower left corner in a manner that will not obstruct the vision of the driver. If the vehicle does not have a windshield, the owner, when applying for registration or renewal of registration, shall notify the department, and the department shall issue a distinctive device for attachment to the rear license plate of the vehicle.

(d) Department rules may provide for the use of an automated registration process, including:

(1) the automated on-site production of registration insignia; and

(2) automated on-premises and off-premises self-service registration.

(e) Subsection (c) does not apply to:

(1) the issuance of specialized license plates as designated by the department, including state official license plates, exempt plates for governmental entities, and temporary registration plates; or

(2) the issuance or validation of replacement license plates, except as provided by Chapter 504.

(f) The registration insignia shall be attached to the rear license plate of the vehicle, if the vehicle is:

(1) a motorcycle;

(2) machinery used exclusively to drill water wells or construction machinery for which a distinguishing license plate has been issued under Section 502.146; or

(3) oil well servicing, oil clean out, or oil well drilling machinery or equipment for which a distinguishing license plate has been issued under Subchapter G, Chapter 623.

Transferred, redesignated and amended from Transportation Code, Section 502.180 by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 90, eff. January 1, 2012.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1291 (H.B. 2305), Sec. 13, eff. March 1, 2015.

Sec. 502.060. REPLACEMENT OF REGISTRATION INSIGNIA. (a) The owner of a registered motor vehicle may obtain a replacement registration insignia by:

(1) certifying that the replacement registration insignia will not be used on any other vehicle owned or operated by the person making the statement;

(2) paying a fee of $6 plus the fees required by Section 502.356(a) for each replacement registration insignia, except as provided by other law; and

(3) returning each replaced registration insignia in the owner's possession.

Text of subsection as amended by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 490 (H.B. 2663), Sec. 1

(b) No fee is required under this section if:

(1) the replacement fee for a license plate has been paid under Section 504.007; or

(2) a county assessor-collector determines that the owner of a registered motor vehicle did not receive a registration insignia that was issued to the owner by mail.

Text of subsection as amended by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 968 (S.B. 2075), Sec. 6

(b) No fee is required under this section if:

(1) the replacement fee for a license plate has been paid under Section 504.007; or

(2) the county assessor-collector determines that the owner paid for a registration insignia for the same registration period that was mailed to the owner but not received by the owner.

(c) A county assessor-collector may not issue a replacement registration insignia without complying with this section.

(d) A county assessor-collector shall retain $2.50 of each fee collected under this section and shall report and send the remainder to the department.

(e) The portion of the fee sent to the department under Subsection (d) shall be deposited to the credit of the Texas Department of Motor Vehicles fund.

Transferred, redesignated and amended from Transportation Code, Section 502.184 by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 91, eff. January 1, 2012.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1287 (H.B. 2202), Sec. 15, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 490 (H.B. 2663), Sec. 1, eff. June 9, 2017.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 968 (S.B. 2075), Sec. 6, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 502.061. REGISTRATION BY OWNER WITH CONDITION THAT IMPEDES EFFECTIVE COMMUNICATION. (a) An application for registration must provide space for the applicant to voluntarily indicate that the applicant has a health condition or disability that may impede effective communication with a peace officer. The department may request from a person who makes an indication under this subsection verification of a condition in the form of:

(1) for a physical health condition, a written statement from a licensed physician; or

(2) for a mental health condition, a written statement from a licensed physician, a licensed psychologist, or a non-physician mental health professional, as defined by Section 571.003, Health and Safety Code.

(b) The department shall provide to the Department of Public Safety the vehicle registration information of a person who voluntarily indicated on an application under Subsection (a) that the person has a health condition or disability that may impede effective communication. The department may not provide to the Department of Public Safety information that shows the type of health condition or disability a person has.

(c) The Department of Public Safety shall establish a system to include information received under Subsection (b) in the Texas Law Enforcement Telecommunications System for the purpose of alerting a peace officer who makes a traffic stop that the operator of the stopped vehicle may have a health condition or disability that may impede effective communication.

(d) The Department of Public Safety may not make information received under Subsection (b) available in the Texas Law Enforcement Telecommunications System to a person who has access to the system under a contract unless the contract prohibits the person from disclosing that information to a person who is not subject to the contract.

(e) The department may not issue to a person without the person's consent a license plate with a visible marking that indicates to the general public that the person voluntarily indicated on an application under Subsection (a) that the person has a health condition or disability that may impede effective communication.

(f) Except as provided by Subsection (d), information supplied to the department relating to an applicant's health condition or disability is for the confidential use of the department and the Department of Public Safety and may not be disclosed to any person.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 613 (S.B. 976), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2019.

SUBCHAPTER C. SPECIAL REGISTRATIONS

Sec. 502.090. EFFECT OF CERTAIN MILITARY SERVICE ON REGISTRATION REQUIREMENT. (a) This section applies only to a motor vehicle that is owned by a person who:

(1) is a resident of this state;

(2) is on active duty in the armed forces of the United States;

(3) is stationed in or has been assigned to another nation under military orders; and

(4) has registered the vehicle or been issued a license for the vehicle under the applicable status of forces agreement by:

(A) the appropriate branch of the armed forces of the United States; or

(B) the nation in which the person is stationed or to which the person has been assigned.

(b) Unless the registration or license issued for a vehicle described by Subsection (a) is suspended, canceled, or revoked by this state as provided by law:

(1) Section 502.040(a) does not apply; and

(2) the registration or license issued by the armed forces or host nation remains valid and the motor vehicle may be operated in this state under that registration or license for a period of not more than 90 days after the date on which the vehicle returns to this state.

Transferred, redesignated and amended from Transportation Code, Section 502.0025 by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 93, eff. January 1, 2012.

Sec. 502.091. INTERNATIONAL REGISTRATION PLAN. (a) The department, through its director, may enter into an agreement with an authorized officer of another jurisdiction, including another state of the United States, a foreign country or a state, province, territory, or possession of a foreign country, to provide for:

(1) the registration of vehicles by residents of this state and nonresidents on an allocation or mileage apportionment plan, as under the International Registration Plan; and

(2) the exemption from payment of registration fees by nonresidents if residents of this state are granted reciprocal exemptions.

(b) The department may adopt and enforce rules to carry out the International Registration Plan or other agreement under this section. The rules may require an applicant to register under the unified carrier registration system as defined by Section 643.001 before the applicant applies for registration under the International Registration Plan.

(c) To carry out the International Registration Plan or other agreement under this section, the department shall direct that fees collected for other jurisdictions under the agreement be deposited to the credit of the proportional registration distributive fund in the state treasury and distributed to the appropriate jurisdiction through that fund. The department is not required to refund any amount less than $10 unless required by the plan.

(d) This section prevails to the extent of conflict with another law relating to the subject of this section.

(e) A person commits an offense if the person owns or operates a vehicle not registered in this state in violation of:

(1) an agreement under this section; or

(2) the applicable registration laws of this state, in the absence of an agreement under this section.

(f) An offense under Subsection (e) is a misdemeanor punishable by a fine not to exceed $200.

Transferred, redesignated and amended from Transportation Code, Section 502.054 by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 94, eff. January 1, 2012.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 968 (S.B. 2075), Sec. 7, eff. September 1, 2017.

Without reference to the amendment of this section, this section was repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 668 (H.B. 718), Sec. 32(1), eff. July 1, 2025.

Sec. 502.092. NONRESIDENT-OWNED VEHICLES USED TO TRANSPORT FARM PRODUCTS. (a) The department may issue to a nonresident owner a permit for a truck, truck-tractor, trailer, or semitrailer that:

(1) is registered in the owner's home state or country; and

(2) will be used to transport:

(A) farm products produced in this state from the place of production to a place of market or storage or a railhead that is not more than 75 miles from the place of production;

(B) machinery used to harvest farm products produced in this state; or

(C) farm products produced outside this state from the point of entry into this state to a place of market, storage, or processing or a railhead or seaport that is not more than 80 miles from the point of entry.

(b) The department shall issue a receipt for a permit issued under this section in a manner provided by the department. The permit receipt must contain the information required by this section and be carried in the vehicle for which it is issued at all times during which it is valid. A permit issued under this section is valid until the earlier of:

(1) the date the vehicle's registration in the owner's home state or country expires; or

(2) the 30th day after the date the permit is issued.

Text of subsection effective until January 01, 2025

(c) A person may obtain a permit under this section by:

(1) applying to the department in a manner prescribed by the department;

(2) paying a fee equal to 1/12 the registration fee prescribed by this chapter for the vehicle;

(3) furnishing satisfactory evidence that the motor vehicle is insured under an insurance policy that complies with Section 601.072 and that is written by:

(A) an insurance company or surety company authorized to write motor vehicle liability insurance in this state; or

(B) with the department's approval, a surplus lines insurer that meets the requirements of Chapter 981, Insurance Code, and rules adopted by the commissioner of insurance under that chapter, if the applicant is unable to obtain insurance from an insurer described by Paragraph (A); and

(4) furnishing evidence that the vehicle has been inspected as required under Chapter 548.

Text of subsection effective on January 01, 2025

(c) A person may obtain a permit under this section by:

(1) applying to the department in a manner prescribed by the department;

(2) paying a fee equal to 1/12 the registration fee prescribed by this chapter for the vehicle;

(3) furnishing satisfactory evidence that the motor vehicle is insured under an insurance policy that complies with Section 601.072 and that is written by:

(A) an insurance company or surety company authorized to write motor vehicle liability insurance in this state; or

(B) with the department's approval, a surplus lines insurer that meets the requirements of Chapter 981, Insurance Code, and rules adopted by the commissioner of insurance under that chapter, if the applicant is unable to obtain insurance from an insurer described by Paragraph (A); and

(4) furnishing evidence that the vehicle has been inspected if required under Chapter 548.

(d) A nonresident owner may not obtain more than three permits under this section during a registration year.

(e) A vehicle for which a permit is issued under this section may not be operated in this state after the permit expires unless the owner:

(1) obtains another temporary permit; or

(2) registers the vehicle under Section 502.253, 502.254, 502.255, or 502.256, as appropriate, for the remainder of the registration year.

(f) A vehicle for which a permit is issued under this section may not be registered under Section 502.433.

(g) A mileage referred to in this section is a state highway mileage.

Transferred, redesignated and amended from Transportation Code, Section 502.355 by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 95, eff. January 1, 2012.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1135 (H.B. 2741), Sec. 68, eff. September 1, 2013.

Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 668 (H.B. 718), Sec. 32(1), eff. July 1, 2025.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 851 (H.B. 3297), Sec. 7, eff. January 1, 2025.

Sec. 502.093. ANNUAL PERMITS. (a) The department may issue an annual permit in lieu of registration to a foreign commercial motor vehicle, trailer, or semitrailer that is subject to registration in this state and is not authorized to travel on a public highway because of the lack of registration in this state or the lack of reciprocity with the state or country in which the vehicle is registered.

(b) A permit issued under this section is valid for a vehicle registration year to begin on the first day of a calendar month designated by the department and end on the last day of the last calendar month of the registration year.

(c) A permit may not be issued under this section for the importation of citrus fruit into this state from a foreign country except for foreign export or processing for foreign export.

(d) A person may obtain a permit under this section by:

(1) applying in the manner prescribed by the department;

(2) paying a fee in the amount required by Subsection (e) in the manner prescribed by the department, including a service charge for a credit card payment or escrow account; and

(3) furnishing evidence of financial responsibility for the motor vehicle that complies with Sections 502.046(c) and 601.168(a), the policies to be written by an insurance company or surety company authorized to write motor vehicle liability insurance in this state.

(e) The fee for a permit under this section is the fee that would be required for registering the vehicle under Section 502.253 or 502.255, except as provided by Subsection (f).

(f) A vehicle registered under this section is exempt from the token fee and is not required to display the associated distinguishing license plate if the vehicle:

(1) is a semitrailer that has a gross weight of more than 6,000 pounds; and

(2) is used or intended to be used in combination with a truck tractor or commercial motor vehicle with a gross vehicle weight of more than 10,000 pounds.

(g) A vehicle registered under this section is not subject to the fee required by Section 502.401 or 502.403.

Transferred, redesignated and amended from Transportation Code, Section 502.353 by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 96, eff. January 1, 2012.

Sec. 502.094. 72- OR 144-HOUR PERMITS. (a) The department may issue a temporary registration permit in lieu of registration for a commercial motor vehicle, trailer, semitrailer, or motor bus that:

(1) is owned by a resident of the United States, Canada, or the United Mexican States;

(2) is subject to registration in this state; and

(3) is not authorized to travel on a public highway because of the lack of registration in this state or the lack of reciprocity with the state or province in which the vehicle is registered.

(b) A permit issued under this section is valid for the period stated on the permit, effective from the date and time shown on the receipt issued as evidence of registration under this section.

(c) A person may obtain a permit under this section by:

(1) applying to the county assessor-collector or the department;

(2) paying a fee of $25 for a 72-hour permit or $50 for a 144-hour permit in the manner prescribed by the department that may include a service charge for a credit card payment or escrow account;

(3) furnishing to the county assessor-collector or the department evidence of financial responsibility for the vehicle that complies with Sections 502.046(c) and 601.168(a); and

(4) submitting a copy of the applicable federal declaration form required by the Federal Motor Carrier Safety Administration or its successor in connection with the importation of a motor vehicle or motor vehicle equipment subject to the federal motor vehicle safety, bumper, and theft prevention standards.

(d) A county assessor-collector shall report and send a fee collected under this section in the manner provided by Section 502.198. The board by rule shall prescribe the format and content of a report required by this subsection.

Text of subsection effective until January 01, 2025

(e) A vehicle issued a permit under this section is subject to Subchapters B and F, Chapter 548, unless the vehicle:

(1) is registered in another state of the United States, in a province of Canada, or in a state of the United Mexican States; or

(2) is mobile drilling or servicing equipment used in the production of gas, crude petroleum, or oil, including a mobile crane or hoisting equipment, mobile lift equipment, forklift, or tug.

Text of subsection effective on January 01, 2025

(e) A vehicle issued a permit under this section is subject to Chapter 548, unless the vehicle:

(1) is registered in another state of the United States, in a province of Canada, or in a state of the United Mexican States; or

(2) is mobile drilling or servicing equipment used in the production of gas, crude petroleum, or oil, including a mobile crane or hoisting equipment, mobile lift equipment, forklift, or tug.

(f) A commercial motor vehicle, trailer, semitrailer, or motor bus apprehended for violating a registration law of this state:

(1) may not be issued a permit under this section; and

(2) is immediately subject to registration in this state.

(g) A person who operates a commercial motor vehicle, trailer, or semitrailer with an expired permit issued under this section is considered to be operating an unregistered vehicle subject to each penalty prescribed by law.

(h) The department may establish one or more escrow accounts in the Texas Department of Motor Vehicles fund for the prepayment of a 72-hour permit or a 144-hour permit. Any fee established by the department for the administration of this subsection shall be administered as required by an agreement entered into by the department.

Transferred, redesignated and amended from Transportation Code, Section 502.352 by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 97, eff. January 1, 2012.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1135 (H.B. 2741), Sec. 69, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1287 (H.B. 2202), Sec. 16, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 851 (H.B. 3297), Sec. 8, eff. January 1, 2025.

Text of section effective until July 01, 2025

Sec. 502.095. ONE-TRIP OR 30-DAY TRIP PERMITS. (a) The department may issue a temporary permit in lieu of registration for a vehicle subject to registration in this state that is not authorized to travel on a public highway because of the lack of registration in this state or the lack of reciprocity with the state or country in which the vehicle is registered.

(b) A permit issued under this section is valid for:

(1) one trip, as provided by Subsection (c); or

(2) 30 days, as provided by Subsection (d).

(c) A one-trip permit is valid for one trip between the points of origin and destination and those intermediate points specified in the application and registration receipt. Unless the vehicle is a bus operating under charter that is not covered by a reciprocity agreement with the state or country in which the bus is registered, a one-trip permit is for the transit of the vehicle only, and the vehicle may not be used for the transportation of any passenger or property. A one-trip permit may not be valid for longer than 15 days from the effective date of registration.

(d) A 30-day permit may be issued only to a passenger vehicle, a private bus, a trailer or semitrailer with a gross weight of not more than 10,000 pounds, a light truck, or a light commercial vehicle with a gross vehicle weight of more than 10,000 pounds that will operate unladen. A person may obtain multiple 30-day permits. The department may issue a single registration receipt to apply to all of the periods for which the vehicle is registered.

(e) A person may obtain a permit under this section by:

(1) applying as provided by the department to:

(A) the county assessor-collector of the county in which the vehicle will first be operated on a public highway; or

(B) the department in Austin or at one of the department's vehicle title and registration regional offices;

(2) paying a fee, in the manner prescribed by the department including a registration service charge for a credit card payment or escrow account of:

(A) $5 for a one-trip permit; or

(B) $25 for each 30-day period; and

(3) furnishing evidence of financial responsibility for the vehicle in a form listed under Section 502.046(c).

(f) A registration receipt shall be carried in the vehicle at all times during the period in which it is valid. The temporary tag must contain all pertinent information required by this section and must be displayed in the rear window of the vehicle so that the tag is clearly visible and legible when viewed from the rear of the vehicle. If the vehicle does not have a rear window, the temporary tag must be attached on or carried in the vehicle to allow ready inspection. The registration receipt must be carried in the vehicle at all times during the period in which it is valid.

(g) The department may refuse and may instruct a county assessor-collector to refuse to issue a temporary registration for any vehicle if, in the department's opinion, the vehicle or the owner of the vehicle has been involved in operations that constitute an abuse of the privilege granted by this section. A registration issued after notice to a county assessor-collector under this subsection is void.

Transferred, redesignated and amended from Transportation Code, Section 502.354 by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 98, eff. January 1, 2012.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 668 (H.B. 718), Sec. 6, eff. July 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on July 01, 2025

Sec. 502.095. ONE-TRIP OR 30-DAY TRIP LICENSE PLATES. (a) The department may issue a temporary metal license plate in lieu of registration for a vehicle subject to registration in this state that is not authorized to travel on a public highway because of the lack of registration in this state or the lack of reciprocity with the state or country in which the vehicle is registered.

(b) A license plate issued under this section is valid for:

(1) one trip, as provided by Subsection (c); or

(2) 30 days, as provided by Subsection (d).

(c) A one-trip license plate is valid for one trip between the points of origin and destination and those intermediate points specified in the application and registration receipt. Unless the vehicle is a bus operating under charter that is not covered by a reciprocity agreement with the state or country in which the bus is registered, a one-trip license plate is for the transit of the vehicle only, and the vehicle may not be used for the transportation of any passenger or property. A one-trip license plate may not be valid for longer than 15 days from the effective date of registration.

(d) A 30-day license plate may be issued only to a passenger vehicle, a private bus, a trailer or semitrailer with a gross weight of not more than 10,000 pounds, a light truck, or a light commercial vehicle with a gross vehicle weight of more than 10,000 pounds that will operate unladen. A person may request from the department an extension of the period a 30-day license plate is valid. The department may issue a single registration receipt to apply to all of the periods for which the vehicle is registered.

(e) A person may obtain a license plate under this section by:

(1) applying as provided by the department to:

(A) the county assessor-collector of the county in which the vehicle will first be operated on a public highway; or

(B) the department in Austin or at one of the department's vehicle title and registration regional offices;

(2) paying a fee, in the manner prescribed by the department including a registration service charge for a credit card payment or escrow account of:

(A) $5 for a one-trip license plate; or

(B) $25 for each 30-day license plate; and

(3) furnishing evidence of financial responsibility for the vehicle in a form listed under Section 502.046(c).

(f) The department shall prepare the design and specifications of a license plate issued under this section. The license plate must contain all pertinent information required by this section and must be displayed as prescribed by department rule. The registration receipt must be carried in the vehicle at all times during the period in which it is valid.

(g) The department may refuse and may instruct a county assessor-collector to refuse to issue a license plate for any vehicle if, in the department's opinion, the vehicle or the owner of the vehicle has been involved in operations that constitute an abuse of the privilege granted by this section. A license plate issued after notice to a county assessor-collector under this subsection is void.

(h) A vehicle operated with a license plate under this section is exempt from the inspection requirements of Chapter 548.

Transferred, redesignated and amended from Transportation Code, Section 502.354 by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 98, eff. January 1, 2012.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 668 (H.B. 718), Sec. 6, eff. July 1, 2025.

SUBCHAPTER D. VEHICLES NOT ISSUED REGISTRATION

Sec. 502.140. CERTAIN OFF-HIGHWAY VEHICLES. (a) In this section, "off-highway vehicle" has the meaning assigned by Section 551A.001.

(b) Except as provided by Subsection (c), the department may not register an off-highway vehicle, with or without design alterations, for operation on a public highway.

(c) The department may register an off-highway vehicle that is owned by the state, county, or municipality for operation on a public beach or highway to maintain public safety and welfare.

(d) Section 504.401 does not apply to an off-highway vehicle.

(e) An off-highway vehicle that is registered under this section:

(1) is not subject to the requirements of Subchapter D, Chapter 551A; and

(2) is subject to the requirements of Subchapter E, Chapter 551A.

Transferred, redesignated and amended from Transportation Code, Section 502.006 by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 100, eff. January 1, 2012.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 895 (H.B. 1044), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 895 (H.B. 1044), Sec. 12, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1233 (H.B. 1548), Sec. 9, eff. June 14, 2019.

Sec. 502.141. OFF-HIGHWAY FORMER MILITARY VEHICLES. (a) Except as provided by Subsections (b) and (c), a person may not register a former military vehicle designated for off-highway use, with or without design alterations, for operation on a public highway.

(b) A former military vehicle may be registered for on-road use if the vehicle:

(1) is a high mobility multipurpose wheeled vehicle designated for off-highway use; and

(2) has a gross vehicle weight rating of less than 10,000 pounds.

(c) A former military vehicle issued specialty license plates under Section 504.502 may be operated on a public highway in accordance with that section.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1079 (H.B. 1755), Sec. 7, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 502.142. MANUFACTURED HOUSING. Manufactured housing, as defined by Section 1201.003, Occupations Code, is not a vehicle subject to this chapter.

Transferred and redesignated from Transportation Code, Section 502.0072 by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 101, eff. January 1, 2012.

Sec. 502.143. OTHER VEHICLES. An owner may not register the following vehicles for operation on a public highway:

(1) power sweepers;

(2) motorized mobility devices;

(3) electric personal assistive mobility devices; and

(4) electric bicycles, as defined by Section 664.001.

Transferred, redesignated and amended from Transportation Code, Section 502.0073 by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 102, eff. January 1, 2012.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 485 (H.B. 2188), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 502.144. VEHICLES OPERATED ON PUBLIC HIGHWAY SEPARATING REAL PROPERTY UNDER VEHICLE OWNER'S CONTROL. Where a public highway separates real property under the control of the owner of a motor vehicle, the operation of the motor vehicle by the owner or the owner's agent or employee across the highway is not a use of the motor vehicle on the public highway.

Transferred and redesignated from Transportation Code, Section 502.0078 by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 103, eff. January 1, 2012.

Sec. 502.145. VEHICLES OPERATED BY CERTAIN NONRESIDENTS. (a) A nonresident owner of a privately owned passenger car that is registered in the state or country in which the person resides and that is not operated for compensation may operate the car in this state for the period in which the car's license plates are valid. In this subsection, "nonresident" means a resident of a state or country other than this state whose presence in this state is as a visitor and who does not engage in gainful employment or enter into business or an occupation, except as may otherwise be provided by any reciprocal agreement with another state or country.

(b) This section does not prevent:

(1) a nonresident owner of a motor vehicle from operating the vehicle in this state for the sole purpose of marketing farm products raised exclusively by the person; or

(2) a resident of an adjoining state or country from operating in this state a privately owned and registered vehicle to go to and from the person's place of regular employment and to make trips to purchase merchandise, if the vehicle is not operated for compensation.

(c) The privileges provided by this section may be allowed only if, under the laws of the appropriate state or country, similar privileges are granted to vehicles registered under the laws of this state and owned by residents of this state.

(d) This section does not affect the right or status of a vehicle owner under any reciprocal agreement between this state and another state or country.

Transferred, redesignated and amended from Transportation Code, Section 502.0079 by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 104, eff. January 1, 2012.

Sec. 502.146. CERTAIN FARM VEHICLES AND DRILLING AND CONSTRUCTION EQUIPMENT. (a) The department shall issue distinguishing license plates to a vehicle described by Subsection (b) or (c). The fee for the license plates is $5 and shall be deposited to the credit of the Texas Department of Motor Vehicles fund.

(b) An owner is not required to register a vehicle that is used only temporarily on the highways if the vehicle is:

(1) a farm trailer or farm semitrailer with a gross weight of more than 4,000 pounds but not more than 34,000 pounds that is used exclusively:

(A) to transport seasonally harvested agricultural products or livestock from the place of production to the place of processing, market, or storage;

(B) to transport farm supplies from the place of loading to the farm; or

(C) for the purpose of participating in equine activities or attending livestock shows, as defined by Section 87.001, Civil Practice and Remedies Code;

(2) machinery used exclusively for the purpose of drilling water wells;

(3) oil well servicing or drilling machinery and if at the time of obtaining the license plates, the applicant submits proof that the applicant has a permit under Section 623.142; or

(4) construction machinery.

(c) An owner is not required to register a vehicle that is:

(1) a farm trailer or farm semitrailer owned by a cotton gin and used exclusively to transport agricultural products without charge from the place of production to the place of processing, market, or storage;

(2) a trailer used exclusively to transport fertilizer without charge from a place of supply or storage to a farm; or

(3) a trailer used exclusively to transport cottonseed without charge from a place of supply or storage to a farm or place of processing.

(c-1) An exemption provided by this section applies to a vehicle owned by a farmers' cooperative society incorporated under Chapter 51, Agriculture Code, or a marketing association organized under Chapter 52, Agriculture Code, and used by members of the society or association for a fee if the vehicle otherwise meets the requirements for the exemption.

Text of subsection effective until January 01, 2025

(d) A vehicle described by Subsection (b) is exempt from the inspection requirements of Subchapters B and F, Chapter 548.

Text of subsection effective on January 01, 2025

(d) A vehicle described by Subsection (b) is exempt from the inspection requirements of Subchapter F, Chapter 548.

(e) Except as provided by Subsection (c-1), this section does not apply to a farm trailer or farm semitrailer that:

(1) is used for hire;

(2) has metal tires operating in contact with the highway;

(3) is not equipped with an adequate hitch pinned or locked so that it will remain securely engaged to the towing vehicle while in motion; or

(4) is not operated and equipped in compliance with all other law.

(f) A vehicle to which this section applies that is operated on a public highway in violation of this section is considered to be operated while unregistered and is immediately subject to the applicable registration fees and penalties prescribed by this chapter.

(g) In this section, the gross weight of a trailer or semitrailer is the combined weight of the vehicle and the load carried on the highway.

(h) A distinguishing license plate may not be issued or renewed under Subsection (a) to an owner of a vehicle described by Subsection (b)(1) unless the vehicle's owner provides a registration number issued by the comptroller under Section 151.1551, Tax Code, or the vehicle is owned by a farmers' cooperative society incorporated under Chapter 51, Agriculture Code, or a marketing association organized under Chapter 52, Agriculture Code. The comptroller shall allow access to the online system established under Section 151.1551(l), Tax Code, to verify a registration number provided under this subsection.

Transferred, redesignated and amended from Transportation Code, Section 504.504 by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 105, eff. January 1, 2012.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1068 (H.B. 3256), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1287 (H.B. 2202), Sec. 17, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 143 (H.B. 75), Sec. 1, eff. May 28, 2015.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 968 (S.B. 2075), Sec. 8, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 851 (H.B. 3297), Sec. 9, eff. January 1, 2025.

Sec. 502.1515. OUTSOURCING PRODUCTION OF RENEWAL NOTICES; PAID ADVERTISING. The board may authorize the department to enter into a contract with a private vendor to produce and distribute motor vehicle registration renewal notices. The contract may provide for the inclusion of paid advertising in the registration renewal notice packet.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 281 (H.B. 2702), Sec. 2.85, eff. June 14, 2005.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 933 (H.B. 3097), Sec. 2E.05, eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 502.156. STATEMENT REQUIRED FOR REBUILT VEHICLES. A county assessor-collector shall require an applicant for registration of a rebuilt vehicle to provide a statement that the vehicle is rebuilt and that states the name of each person from whom the parts used in assembling the vehicle were obtained.

Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 502.168. FEE: MOTOR BUS. The fee for a registration year for registration of a motor bus is the fee prescribed by Section 502.252 or 502.253, as applicable.

Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1136 (H.B. 2553), Sec. 26, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 20.010, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1135 (H.B. 2741), Sec. 70, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 502.1746. VOLUNTARY CONTRIBUTION TO VETERANS' ASSISTANCE FUND. (a) When a person registers a motor vehicle under this chapter, the person is entitled to make a voluntary contribution in any amount to the fund for veterans' assistance established by Section 434.017, Government Code, as redesignated and amended by Chapter 1418 (H.B. 3107), Acts of the 80th Legislature, Regular Session, 2007.

(b) The county assessor-collector shall send any contribution made under this section to the comptroller for deposit in the state treasury to the credit of the fund for veterans' assistance before the 31st day after the date the contribution is made. A contribution made under this section may be used only for the purposes of the fund for veterans' assistance.

(c) The department shall:

(1) include space on each motor vehicle registration renewal notice, on the page that states the total fee for registration renewal, that allows a person renewing a registration to indicate the amount that the person is voluntarily contributing to the fund for veterans' assistance;

(2) provide an opportunity to contribute to the fund for veterans' assistance similar to the opportunity described by Subsection (a) and in the manner described by Subdivision (1) in any registration renewal system that succeeds the system in place on September 1, 2011; and

(3) provide an opportunity for a person to contribute to the fund for veterans' assistance during the registration renewal process on the department's Internet website.

(d) If a person makes a contribution under this section and does not pay the full amount of a registration fee, the county assessor-collector may credit all or a portion of the contribution to the person's registration fee.

(e) The department shall consult with the Texas Veterans Commission in performing the department's duties under this section.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 840 (S.B. 1940), Sec. 3, eff. June 19, 2009.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 669 (S.B. 1635), Sec. 2, eff. June 17, 2011.

Sec. 502.1747. VOLUNTARY CONTRIBUTION TO PARKS AND WILDLIFE DEPARTMENT. (a) When a person registers or renews the registration of a motor vehicle under this chapter, the person may contribute $5 or more to the Parks and Wildlife Department.

(b) The department shall:

(1) include space on each motor vehicle registration renewal notice, on the page that states the total fee for registration renewal, that allows a person renewing a registration to indicate the amount that the person is voluntarily contributing to the state parks account;

(2) provide an opportunity to contribute to the state parks account similar to the opportunity described by Subsection (a) and in the manner described by Subdivision (1) in any registration renewal system that succeeds the system in place on September 1, 2011; and

(3) provide an opportunity for a person to contribute to the state parks account during the registration renewal process on the department's Internet website.

(c) If a person makes a contribution under this section and does not pay the full amount of a registration fee, the county assessor-collector may credit all or a portion of the contribution to the person's registration fee.

(d) The county assessor-collector shall send any contribution made under this section to the comptroller for deposit to the credit of the state parks account under Section 11.035, Parks and Wildlife Code. Money received by the Parks and Wildlife Department under this section may be used only for the operation and maintenance of state parks, historic sites, or natural areas under the jurisdiction of the Parks and Wildlife Department.

(e) The department shall consult with the Parks and Wildlife Department in performing the department's duties under this section.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 749 (H.B. 1301), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2011.

Sec. 502.1748. DISPOSITION OF CERTAIN VOLUNTARY CONTRIBUTIONS. If a person makes a voluntary contribution under Section 502.1746 or 502.1747 at the time the person registers or renews the registration of a motor vehicle under this chapter but the person does not clearly specify the entity to which the person intends to contribute, the county assessor-collector shall divide the contribution between the entities authorized to receive contributions under those sections.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 749 (H.B. 1301), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2011.

Sec. 502.189. DONOR REGISTRY INFORMATION. (a) The department, with expert input and support from the nonprofit organization administering the Glenda Dawson Donate Life-Texas Registry under Chapter 692A, Health and Safety Code, shall:

(1) add a link from the department's Internet website to the Glenda Dawson Donate Life-Texas Registry operated under Chapter 692A, Health and Safety Code; and

(2) provide a method to distribute donor registry information to interested individuals in each office authorized to issue motor vehicle registrations.

(b) The department shall make available for distribution to each office authorized to issue motor vehicle registrations Donate Life brochures that provide basic donor information in English and Spanish and a contact phone number and e-mail address. The department shall ensure that the question provided in Section 521.401(c)(1)(B) and information on the donor registry Internet website is included with registration renewal notices.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 831 (S.B. 1803), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2009.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 554 (H.B. 2904), Sec. 3, eff. January 1, 2012.

SUBCHAPTER E. ADMINISTRATION OF FEES

Sec. 502.190. SCHEDULE OF REGISTRATION FEES. The department shall post a complete schedule of registration fees on the Internet.

Transferred, redesignated and amended from Transportation Code, Section 502.159 by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 107, eff. January 1, 2012.

Sec. 502.191. COLLECTION OF FEES. (a) A person may not collect a registration fee under this chapter unless the person is:

(1) an officer or employee of the department; or

(2) a county assessor-collector or a deputy county assessor-collector.

(b) The department may accept electronic payment by electronic funds transfer, credit card, or debit card of any fee that the department is authorized to collect under this chapter.

(c) The department may collect a fee for processing a payment by electronic funds transfer, credit card, or debit card in an amount not to exceed the amount of the charges incurred by the department to process the payment.

(d) The department may collect the fee set under Section 2054.2591, Government Code, from a person making a payment by electronic funds transfer, credit card, or debit card through the online project implemented under Section 2054.252, Government Code.

(e) If, for any reason, the payment of a fee under this chapter by electronic funds transfer, credit card, or debit card is not honored by the funding institution or by the electronic funds transfer, credit card, or debit card company on which the funds are drawn, the department may collect from the person who owes the fee being collected a service charge that is for the collection of that original amount and is in addition to the original fee. The amount of the service charge must be reasonably related to the expense incurred by the department in collecting the original amount.

(f) The department may not collect a fee under Subsection (c) or (d) if the department collects a fee under Section 502.1911.

Transferred, redesignated and amended from Transportation Code, Section 502.004 by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 108, eff. January 1, 2012.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1287 (H.B. 2202), Sec. 18, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 502.1911. REGISTRATION PROCESSING AND HANDLING FEE. (a) The department may collect a fee, in addition to other registration fees for the issuance of a license plate, a set of license plates, or another device used as the registration insignia, to cover the expenses of collecting those registration fees, including a service charge for registration by mail.

(b) The board by rule shall set the fee in an amount that:

(1) includes the fee established under Section 502.356(a); and

(2) is sufficient to cover the expenses associated with collecting registration fees by:

(A) the department;

(B) a county tax assessor-collector;

(C) a private entity with which a county tax assessor-collector contracts under Section 502.197; or

(D) a deputy assessor-collector that is deputized in accordance with board rule under Section 520.0071.

(c) The county tax assessor-collector, a private entity with which a county tax assessor-collector contracts under Section 502.197, or a deputy assessor-collector may retain a portion of the fee collected under Subsection (b) as provided by board rule. Remaining amounts collected under this section shall be deposited to the credit of the Texas Department of Motor Vehicles fund.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1287 (H.B. 2202), Sec. 19, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 502.192. TRANSFER FEE. The purchaser of a used motor vehicle shall pay, in addition to any fee required under Chapter 501 for the transfer of title, a transfer fee of $2.50 for the transfer of the registration of the motor vehicle. The county assessor-collector may retain as commission for services provided under this subchapter half of each transfer fee collected. The portion of each transfer fee not retained by the county assessor-collector shall be deposited to the credit of the Texas Department of Motor Vehicles fund.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 109, eff. January 1, 2012.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1287 (H.B. 2202), Sec. 20, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 502.193. PAYMENT BY CHECK DRAWN AGAINST INSUFFICIENT FUNDS. (a) A county assessor-collector who receives from any person a check or draft for payment of a registration fee for a registration year that has not ended that is returned unpaid because of insufficient funds or no funds in the bank or trust company to the credit of the drawer of the check or draft shall certify the fact to the sheriff or a constable or highway patrol officer in the county after attempts to contact the person fail to result in the collection of payment. The certification must be made before the 30th day after the date the check or draft is returned unpaid and:

(1) be under the assessor-collector's official seal;

(2) include the name and address of the person who gave the check or draft;

(3) include the license plate number and make of the vehicle;

(4) be accompanied by the check or draft; and

(5) be accompanied by documentation of any attempt to contact the person and collect payment.

(b) On receiving a complaint under Subsection (a) from the county assessor-collector, the sheriff, constable, or highway patrol officer shall find the person who gave the check or draft, if the person is in the county, and demand immediate redemption of the check or draft from the person. If the person fails or refuses to redeem the check or draft, the sheriff, constable, or highway patrol officer shall:

(1) seize and remove the license plates and registration insignia from the vehicle; and

(2) return the license plates and registration insignia to the county assessor-collector.

Transferred, redesignated and amended from Transportation Code, Section 502.181 by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 110, eff. January 1, 2012.

Sec. 502.1931. DISPUTED PAYMENT BY CREDIT CARD OR DEBIT CARD. (a) A county assessor-collector who receives from any person a payment by credit card or debit card for a registration fee for a registration year that has not ended that is returned unpaid because the payment by the credit card or debit card has been disputed by the credit card or debit card company shall certify the fact to the sheriff or a constable or highway patrol officer in the county after attempts to contact the person fail to result in the collection of payment. The certification must be made before the 30th day after the date the assessor-collector is made aware that the credit card or debit card payment has been disputed and:

(1) be under the assessor-collector's official seal;

(2) include the name and address of the person who authorized the credit card or debit card payment;

(3) include the license plate number and make of the vehicle;

(4) be accompanied by evidence from the credit card or debit card company that the company has determined that it will not make payment on the disputed credit card or debit card charge; and

(5) be accompanied by documentation of any attempt to contact the person and collect payment.

(b) On receiving a complaint under Subsection (a) from the county assessor-collector, the sheriff, constable, or highway patrol officer shall find the person who authorized the credit card or debit card payment, if the person is in the county, and demand immediate redemption of payment from the person. If the person fails or refuses to redeem the payment, the sheriff, constable, or highway patrol officer shall:

(1) seize and remove the license plates and registration insignia from the vehicle; and

(2) return the license plates and registration insignia to the assessor-collector.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 123 (S.B. 1451), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 502.194. CREDIT FOR REGISTRATION FEE PAID ON MOTOR VEHICLE SUBSEQUENTLY DESTROYED. (a) The owner of a motor vehicle that is destroyed to the extent that it cannot afterwards be operated on a public highway is entitled to a registration fee credit if the prorated portion of the registration fee for the remainder of the registration year is more than $15. The owner must claim the credit by sending the registration fee receipt for the vehicle to the department.

(b) The department, on satisfactory proof that the vehicle is destroyed, shall issue a registration fee credit slip to the owner in an amount equal to the prorated portion of the registration fee for the remainder of the registration year. The owner, during the same or the next registration year, may use the registration fee credit slip as payment or part payment for the registration of another vehicle to the extent of the credit.

Transferred, redesignated and amended from Transportation Code, Section 502.182 by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 111, eff. January 1, 2012.

Sec. 502.195. REFUND OF OVERCHARGED REGISTRATION FEE. (a) The owner of a motor vehicle who pays an annual registration fee in excess of the statutory amount is entitled to a refund of the overcharge.

(b) The county assessor-collector who collects the excessive fee shall refund an overcharge on presentation to the assessor-collector of satisfactory evidence of the overcharge not later than the first anniversary of the date the excessive registration fee was paid.

(c) A refund shall be paid from the fund in which the county's share of registration fees is deposited.

Transferred, redesignated and amended from Transportation Code, Section 502.183 by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 112, eff. January 1, 2012.

Sec. 502.196. DEPOSIT OF REGISTRATION FEES IN STATE HIGHWAY FUND. Except as otherwise provided by this chapter, the board and the department shall deposit all money received from registration fees in the state treasury to the credit of the state highway fund.

Transferred and redesignated from Transportation Code, Section 502.051 by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 113, eff. January 1, 2012.

Sec. 502.197. REGISTRATION BY MAIL OR ELECTRONIC MEANS; SERVICE CHARGE. (a) A county assessor-collector may retain a service charge in the amount determined by the board under Section 502.1911 from each applicant registering a vehicle by mail. The service charge shall be used to pay the costs of handling and postage to mail the registration receipt and insignia to the applicant.

(b) With the approval of the commissioners court of a county, a county assessor-collector may contract with a private entity to enable an applicant for registration to use an electronic off-premises location. A private entity may retain an amount determined by the board under Section 502.1911 for the service provided.

(c) The department may adopt rules to cover the timely application for and issuance of registration receipts and insignia by mail or through an electronic off-premises location.

Transferred and redesignated from Transportation Code, Section 502.101 by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 114, eff. January 1, 2012.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1287 (H.B. 2202), Sec. 21.

Sec. 502.198. DISPOSITION OF FEES GENERALLY. (a) Except as provided by Sections 502.058, 502.060, 502.1911, 502.192, 502.356, 502.357, and 502.360 and Subchapter H, this section applies to all fees collected by a county assessor-collector under this chapter.

(b) Each Tuesday, a county assessor-collector shall credit to the county road and bridge fund an amount equal to the net collections made during the preceding week until the amount so credited for the calendar year equals the total of:

(1) $60,000; and

(2) $350 for each mile of county road maintained by the county, according to the most recent information available from the department, not to exceed 500 miles.

(c) After the credits to the county road and bridge fund equal the total computed under Subsection (b), each Tuesday the county assessor-collector shall:

(1) credit to the county road and bridge fund an amount equal to 50 percent of the net collections made during the preceding week, until the amount so credited for the calendar year equals $125,000; and

(2) send to the department an amount equal to 50 percent of those collections for deposit to the credit of the state highway fund.

(d) After the credits to the county road and bridge fund equal the total amounts computed under Subsections (b) and (c)(1), each Tuesday the county assessor-collector shall send to the department all collections made during the preceding week for deposit to the credit of the state highway fund.

Transferred, redesignated and amended from Transportation Code, Section 502.102 by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 115, eff. January 1, 2012.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1287 (H.B. 2202), Sec. 22, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 968 (S.B. 2075), Sec. 9, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 14 (S.B. 505), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 502.1983. DEPOSIT OF FEES IN INTEREST-BEARING ACCOUNT. (a) A county assessor-collector may:

(1) deposit the fees subject to Section 502.198 in an interest-bearing account or certificate in the county depository; and

(2) send the fees to the department not later than the 34th day after the date the fees are due under Section 502.198.

(b) The county owns all interest earned on fees deposited under this section. The county treasurer shall credit the interest to the county general fund.

Transferred, redesignated and amended from Transportation Code, Section 502.106 by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 118, eff. January 1, 2012.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1287 (H.B. 2202), Sec. 23, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 968 (S.B. 2075), Sec. 10, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 502.1984. INTEREST ON FEES. (a) A fee required to be sent to the department under this chapter bears interest for the benefit of the state highway fund or the Texas Department of Motor Vehicles fund, as applicable, at an annual rate of 10 percent beginning on the 60th day after the date the county assessor-collector collects the fee.

(b) The department shall audit the registration and transfer fees collected and disbursed by each county assessor-collector and shall determine the exact amount of interest due on any fee not sent to the department.

(c) The state has a claim against a county assessor-collector and the sureties on the assessor-collector's official bond for the amount of interest due on a fee.

Transferred and redesignated from Transportation Code, Section 502.107 by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 119, eff. January 1, 2012.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1287 (H.B. 2202), Sec. 24, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 502.1985. USE OF REGISTRATION FEES RETAINED BY COUNTY. (a) Money credited to the county road and bridge fund under Section 502.198 may not be used to pay the compensation of the county judge or a county commissioner. The money may be used only for the construction and maintenance of lateral roads in the county, under the supervision of the county engineer.

(b) If there is not a county engineer, the commissioners court of the county may require the services of the department's district engineer or resident engineer to supervise the construction and surveying of lateral roads in the county.

(c) A county may use money allocated to it under this chapter to:

(1) pay obligations issued in the construction or improvement of any roads, including state highways in the county;

(2) improve the roads in the county road system; or

(3) construct new roads.

(d) To the maximum extent possible, contracts for roads constructed by a county using funds provided under this chapter should be awarded by competitive bids.

Transferred, redesignated and amended from Transportation Code, Section 502.108 by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 120, eff. January 1, 2012.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1287 (H.B. 2202), Sec. 25, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 502.1986. CONTINGENT PROVISION FOR DISTRIBUTION OF FEES BETWEEN STATE AND COUNTIES. If the method of distributing vehicle registration fees collected under this chapter between the state and counties is declared invalid because of inequality of collection or distribution of those fees, 60 percent of each fee shall be distributed to the county collecting the fee and 40 percent shall be sent to the state in the manner provided by this chapter.

Transferred and redesignated from Transportation Code, Section 502.110 by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 121, eff. January 1, 2012.

Sec. 502.199. ELECTRONIC FUNDS TRANSFER. A county assessor-collector that transfers money to the department under this chapter shall transfer the money electronically.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1135 (H.B. 2741), Sec. 71, eff. September 1, 2013.

SUBCHAPTER F. REGULAR REGISTRATION FEES

Sec. 502.251. FEE: MOTORCYCLE OR MOPED. The fee for a registration year for registration of a motorcycle or moped is $30.

Transferred and redesignated from Transportation Code, Section 502.160 by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 123, eff. January 1, 2012.

Sec. 502.252. FEE: VEHICLES THAT WEIGH 6,000 POUNDS OR LESS. (a) The fee for a registration year for registration of a vehicle with a gross weight of 6,000 pounds or less is $50.75, unless otherwise provided in this chapter.

(b) Repealed by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1135, Sec. 140(2), eff. September 1, 2013.

Transferred, redesignated and amended from Transportation Code, Section 502.161 by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 124, eff. January 1, 2012.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1135 (H.B. 2741), Sec. 140(2), eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 502.253. FEE: VEHICLES THAT WEIGH MORE THAN 6,000 POUNDS. The fee for a registration year for registration of a vehicle with a gross weight of more than 6,000 pounds is as follows unless otherwise provided in this chapter:

Weight Classification Fee Schedule

in pounds

6,001-10,000 $54.00

10,001-18,000 $110.00

18,001-25,999 $205.00

26,000-40,000 $340.00

40,001-54,999 $535.00

55,000-70,000 $740.00

70,001-80,000 $840.00

Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1136 (H.B. 2553), Sec. 21, eff. September 1, 2011.

Transferred, redesignated and amended from Transportation Code, Section 502.162 by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 125, eff. January 1, 2012.

Sec. 502.254. FEE: TRAILER, TRAVEL TRAILER, OR SEMITRAILER. (a) The fee for a registration year for registration of a trailer, travel trailer, or semitrailer with a gross weight of 6,000 pounds or less is $45.00.

(b) The fee for a registration year for registration of a trailer, travel trailer, or semitrailer with a gross weight of more than 6,000 pounds is calculated by gross weight according to Section 502.253.

Transferred, redesignated and amended from Transportation Code, Section 502.166 by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 126, eff. January 1, 2012.

Sec. 502.255. TRUCK-TRACTOR OR COMMERCIAL MOTOR VEHICLE COMBINATION FEE; SEMITRAILER TOKEN FEE. (a) This section applies only to a truck-tractor or commercial motor vehicle with a gross weight of more than 10,000 pounds that is used or is to be used in combination with a semitrailer that has a gross weight of more than 6,000 pounds.

(b) The fee for a registration year for registration of a truck-tractor or commercial motor vehicle is calculated by gross weight according to Section 502.253.

(c) The fee for registration of a semitrailer used in the manner described by Subsection (a), regardless of the date the semitrailer is registered, is $15 for a registration year.

(d) A registration made under Subsection (c) is valid only when the semitrailer is used in the manner described by Subsection (a).

(e) For registration purposes, a semitrailer converted to a trailer by means of an auxiliary axle assembly retains its status as a semitrailer.

(f) A combination of vehicles may not be registered under this section for a combined gross weight of less than 18,000 pounds.

(g) This section does not apply to:

(1) a combination of vehicles that includes a vehicle that has a distinguishing license plate under Section 502.146;

(2) a truck-tractor or commercial motor vehicle registered or to be registered with $5 distinguishing license plates for which the vehicle is eligible under this chapter;

(3) a truck-tractor or commercial motor vehicle used exclusively in combination with a semitrailer of the travel trailer type; or

(4) a vehicle registered or to be registered:

(A) with a temporary registration permit;

(B) under Section 502.433; or

(C) under Section 502.435.

(h) The department may adopt rules to administer this section.

(i) The department shall issue a license plate for a token trailer registered under this section that does not expire or require an annual registration insignia to be valid. The alphanumeric pattern for a license plate issued under this subsection may remain on a token trailer for as long as the registration of the token trailer is renewed or until the token trailer is removed from service or sold. The registration receipt required under Section 621.002 is not required for a vehicle that displays a license plate issued under this subsection.

(j) A person may register a semitrailer under this section if the person:

(1) applies to the department for registration;

(2) provides proof of the person's eligibility to register the vehicle under this subsection as required by the department; and

(3) pays a fee of $15, plus any applicable fee under Section 502.401, for each year included in the registration period.

Transferred, redesignated and amended from Transportation Code, Section 502.167 by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 127, eff. January 1, 2012.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 252 (H.B. 511), Sec. 2, eff. June 14, 2013.

Sec. 502.256. FEE: ROAD TRACTOR. The fee for a registration year for registration of a road tractor is the fee prescribed by weight as certified by a public weigher or a license and weight inspector of the Department of Public Safety under Section 502.252 or 502.253, as applicable.

Transferred, redesignated and amended from Transportation Code, Section 502.165 by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 128, eff. January 1, 2012.

SUBCHAPTER G. ADDITIONAL FEES

Sec. 502.356. AUTOMATED REGISTRATION AND TITLING SYSTEM. (a) In addition to other registration fees for a license plate or set of license plates or other device used as the registration insignia, the board by rule shall adopt a fee of not less than 50 cents and not more than $1. The fee shall be collected and deposited into a subaccount in the Texas Department of Motor Vehicles fund.

(b) The department may use money collected under this section to provide for or enhance the automation of and the necessary infrastructure for:

(1) on-premises and off-premises registration and permitting, including permitting under Subtitle E;

(2) services related to the titling of vehicles; and

(3) licensing and enforcement procedures.

Transferred, redesignated and amended from Transportation Code, Section 502.1705 by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 130, eff. January 1, 2012.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1287 (H.B. 2202), Sec. 26, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 502.357. FINANCIAL RESPONSIBILITY PROGRAMS. (a) In addition to other fees imposed for registration of a motor vehicle, at the time of application for registration or renewal of registration of a motor vehicle for which the owner is required to submit evidence of financial responsibility under Section 502.046, the applicant shall pay a fee of $1. In addition to other fees imposed for registration of a motor vehicle, at the time of application for registration of a motor vehicle that is subject to Section 501.0234, the applicant shall pay a fee of $1. Fees collected under this section shall be remitted weekly to the department.

(b) Fees collected under this section shall be deposited to the credit of the state highway fund except that the comptroller shall provide for a portion of the fees to be deposited first to the credit of a special fund in the state treasury outside the general revenue fund to be known as the TexasSure Fund in a total amount that is necessary to cover the total amount appropriated to the Texas Department of Insurance from that fund and for the remaining fees to be deposited to the state highway fund. Subject to appropriations, the money deposited to the credit of the state highway fund under this section may be used by the Department of Public Safety to:

(1) support the Department of Public Safety's reengineering of the driver's license system to provide for the issuance by the Department of Public Safety of a driver's license or personal identification certificate, to include use of image comparison technology; and

(2) make lease payments to the master lease purchase program for the financing of the driver's license reengineering project.

(c) Subject to appropriation, fees collected under this section may be used by the Department of Public Safety, the Texas Department of Insurance, the Department of Information Resources, and the department to carry out Subchapter N, Chapter 601.

(d) The Department of Public Safety, the Texas Department of Insurance, the Department of Information Resources, and the department shall jointly adopt rules and develop forms necessary to administer this section.

Reenacted, transferred, redesignated and amended from Transportation Code, Section 502.1715 by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 131, eff. January 1, 2012.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 987 (H.B. 6), Sec. 19(a), eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1094 (H.B. 2048), Sec. 10, eff. September 1, 2019.

For expiration of this section, see Subsection (c).

Sec. 502.358. TEXAS EMISSIONS REDUCTION PLAN SURCHARGE. (a) In addition to the registration fees charged under Section 502.255, a surcharge is imposed on the registration of a truck-tractor or commercial motor vehicle under that section in an amount equal to 10 percent of the total fees due for the registration of the truck-tractor or commercial motor vehicle under that section.

(b) The county tax assessor-collector shall remit the surcharge collected under this section to the comptroller at the time and in the manner prescribed by the comptroller for deposit in the Texas emissions reduction plan fund.

(c) This section expires on the last day of the state fiscal biennium during which the Texas Commission on Environmental Quality publishes in the Texas Register the notice required by Section 382.037, Health and Safety Code.

Transferred, redesignated and amended from Transportation Code, Section 502.1675 by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 132, eff. January 1, 2012.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1301 (H.B. 3745), Sec. 2.04, eff. August 30, 2019.

Sec. 502.359. ADDITIONAL FEE FOR CERTAIN VEHICLES USING DIESEL MOTOR. (a) The registration fee under this chapter for a motor vehicle other than a passenger car, a truck with a gross vehicle weight of 18,000 pounds or less, or a vehicle registered in combination under Section 502.255 is increased by 11 percent if the vehicle has a diesel motor.

(b) The registration receipt for a motor vehicle, other than a passenger car or a truck with a gross vehicle weight of 18,000 pounds or less, must show that the vehicle has a diesel motor.

(c) The department may adopt rules to administer this section.

Transferred, redesignated and amended from Transportation Code, Section 502.171 by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 133, eff. January 1, 2012.

Sec. 502.360. ADDITIONAL FEE FOR ELECTRIC VEHICLES. (a) In this section, "electric vehicle" means a motor vehicle that has a gross weight of 10,000 pounds or less and uses electricity as its only source of motor power. The term does not include:

(1) an autocycle, as defined by Section 501.008;

(2) a moped, as defined by Section 541.201;

(3) a motorcycle, as defined by Sections 521.001 and 541.201; or

(4) a neighborhood electric vehicle, as defined by Section 551.301.

(b) In addition to other fees authorized under this chapter, at the time of application for registration or renewal of registration of an electric vehicle, the applicant shall pay an additional fee of:

(1) $400, for the registration of a new vehicle to which Section 548.102 applies; or

(2) $200, for the registration or renewal of registration of a vehicle to which Section 548.101 applies.

(c) Fees collected under this section must be deposited to the credit of the state highway fund.

(d) The department may adopt rules to administer this section.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 14 (S.B. 505), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2023.

SUBCHAPTER H. OPTIONAL FEES

Sec. 502.401. OPTIONAL COUNTY FEE FOR ROAD AND BRIDGE FUND. (a) The commissioners court of a county by order may impose an additional fee, not to exceed $10, for registering a vehicle in the county.

(b) A vehicle that may be registered under this chapter without payment of a registration fee may be registered in a county imposing a fee under this section without payment of the additional fee.

(c) A fee imposed under this section may take effect only on January 1 of a year. The county must adopt the order and notify the department not later than September 1 of the year preceding the year in which the fee takes effect.

(d) A fee imposed under this section may be removed. The removal may take effect only on January 1 of a year. A county may remove the fee only by:

(1) rescinding the order imposing the fee; and

(2) notifying the department not later than September 1 of the year preceding the year in which the removal takes effect.

(e) The county assessor-collector of a county imposing a fee under this section shall collect the additional fee for a vehicle when other fees imposed under this chapter are collected.

(f) The department shall collect the additional fee on a vehicle that is owned by a resident of a county imposing a fee under this section that must be registered directly with the department. The department shall send all fees collected for a county under this subsection to the county treasurer to be credited to the county road and bridge fund.

(g) The department shall adopt rules necessary to administer registration for a vehicle being registered in a county imposing a fee under this section.

Transferred, redesignated and amended from Transportation Code, Section 502.172 by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 135, eff. January 1, 2012.

Sec. 502.402. OPTIONAL COUNTY FEE FOR TRANSPORTATION PROJECTS. (a) This section applies only to:

(1) a county that:

(A) borders the United Mexican States; and

(B) has a population of more than 250,000;

(2) a county that has a population of more than 1.5 million that is coterminous with a regional mobility authority; and

(3) a county that has a population of more than 190,000 and not more than 1.5 million that is coterminous with a regional mobility authority.

(b) The commissioners court of a county by order may impose an additional fee for a vehicle registered in the county. Except as provided by Subsection (b-1), the fee may not exceed $10. In a county described by Subsection (a)(3), the fee must be approved by a majority of the qualified voters of the county voting on the issue at a referendum election, which the commissioners court may order and hold for that purpose.

(b-1) The commissioners court of a county described by Subsection (a) with a population of less than 700,000 may increase the additional fee to an amount that does not exceed $20 if approved by a majority of the qualified voters of the county voting on the issue at a referendum election, which the commissioners court may order and hold for that purpose.

(c) A vehicle that may be registered under this chapter without payment of a registration fee may be registered under this section without payment of the additional fee.

(d) A fee imposed under this section may take effect and be removed in accordance with the requirements of Section 502.401.

(e) The additional fee shall be collected for a vehicle when other fees imposed under this chapter are collected. The fee revenue collected shall be sent to a regional mobility authority located in the county to fund long-term transportation projects in the county that are consistent with the purposes specified by Section 7-a, Article VIII, Texas Constitution.

(f) The department shall adopt rules necessary to administer registration for a vehicle being registered in a county imposing a fee under this section.

Transferred, redesignated and amended from Transportation Code, Section 502.1725 by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 136, eff. January 1, 2012.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 706 (H.B. 3126), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1273 (H.B. 1198), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1277 (H.B. 1573), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1236 (S.B. 1296), Sec. 17.005, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 466 (H.B. 1698), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 502.403. OPTIONAL COUNTY FEE FOR CHILD SAFETY. (a) The commissioners court of a county that has a population greater than 1.3 million and in which a municipality with a population of more than one million is primarily located may impose by order an additional fee of not less than 50 cents or more than $1.50 for a vehicle registered in the county. The commissioners court of any other county may impose by order an additional fee of not more than $1.50 for registering a vehicle in the county.

(b) A vehicle that may be registered under this chapter without payment of a registration fee may be registered without payment of the additional fee.

(c) A fee imposed under this section may take effect and be removed in accordance with the provisions of Section 502.401.

(d) The additional fee shall be collected for a vehicle when other fees imposed under this chapter are collected.

(e) A county imposing a fee under this section may deduct for administrative costs an amount of not more than 10 percent of the revenue it receives from the fee. The county may also deduct from the fee revenue an amount proportional to the percentage of county residents who live in unincorporated areas of the county. After making the deductions provided for by this subsection, the county shall send the remainder of the fee revenue to the municipalities in the county according to their population.

(f) A municipality with a population greater than 1.3 million shall deposit revenue from a fee imposed under this subsection to the credit of the child safety trust fund created under Section 106.001, Local Government Code. A municipality with a population less than 1.3 million shall use revenue from a fee imposed under this section in accordance with Article 102.014(g), Code of Criminal Procedure.

(g) After deducting administrative costs, a county may use revenue from a fee imposed under this section only for a purpose permitted by Article 102.014(g), Code of Criminal Procedure.

Transferred, redesignated and amended from Transportation Code, Section 502.173 by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 137, eff. January 1, 2012.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 644 (H.B. 4559), Sec. 265, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 502.404. VOLUNTARY ASSESSMENT FOR TEXAS AGRICULTURAL FINANCE AUTHORITY. (a) When a person registers a commercial motor vehicle under Section 502.433, the person shall pay a voluntary assessment of $5.

(b) The county assessor-collector shall send an assessment collected under this section to the comptroller, at the time and in the manner prescribed by the Texas Agricultural Finance Authority, for deposit in the Texas agricultural fund.

(c) The Texas Agricultural Finance Authority shall prescribe procedures under which an assessment collected under this section may be refunded. The county assessor-collector of the county in which an assessment is collected shall:

(1) implement the refund procedures; and

(2) provide notice of those procedures to a person paying an assessment at the time of payment.

Transferred, redesignated and amended from Transportation Code, Section 502.174 by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 138, eff. January 1, 2012.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1197 (S.B. 1214), Sec. 7, eff. June 14, 2013.

Sec. 502.405. VOLUNTARY CONTRIBUTION TO DONOR REGISTRY. (a) The department shall provide to each county assessor-collector the educational materials for prospective donors provided under Section 502.189.

(b) When a person applies for the registration or renewal of registration of a motor vehicle, the person may elect to contribute $1 or more to the nonprofit organization administering the Glenda Dawson Donate Life-Texas Registry established under Chapter 692A, Health and Safety Code. The department shall remit any contribution paid under this subsection to the comptroller for deposit to the credit of the Glenda Dawson Donate Life-Texas Registry fund created under Section 692A.020, Health and Safety Code. Money received under this subsection by the organization may be used only for the purposes described by Section 692A.020(i), Health and Safety Code. The organization shall submit an annual report to the legislature and the comptroller that includes the total dollar amount of money received by the organization under this subsection. If a person makes a contribution under this section and does not pay the full amount of the registration fee, the department may credit all or a portion of the contribution to the person's registration fee. The department shall:

(1) include space on each motor vehicle registration renewal notice, on the page that states the total fee for registration renewal, that allows a person renewing a registration to voluntarily contribute $1 or more to the organization;

(2) provide an opportunity for a person to contribute $1 or more to the organization during the registration renewal process on the department's Internet website; and

(3) provide an opportunity to contribute $1 or more to the organization in any registration renewal system that succeeds the registration renewal system in place on September 1, 2015.

(c) Three percent of all money collected under this section shall be credited to the Texas Department of Motor Vehicles fund and may be appropriated only to the department to administer this section.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1186 (H.B. 120), Sec. 8, eff. September 1, 2005.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 554 (H.B. 2904), Sec. 2, eff. January 1, 2012.

Transferred, redesignated and amended from Transportation Code, Section 502.1745 by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 139, eff. January 1, 2012.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1287 (H.B. 2202), Sec. 27, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1261 (H.B. 3283), Sec. 1, eff. January 1, 2016.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1261 (H.B. 3283), Sec. 2, eff. January 1, 2016.

Sec. 502.407. OPERATION OF VEHICLE WITH EXPIRED LICENSE PLATE. (a) A person commits an offense if, after the fifth working day after the date the registration for the vehicle expires:

(1) the person operates on a public highway during a registration period a motor vehicle, trailer, or semitrailer that has attached to it a license plate for the preceding period; and

(2) the license plate has not been validated by the attachment of a registration insignia for the registration period in effect.

(b) A justice of the peace or municipal court judge having jurisdiction of the offense may:

(1) dismiss a charge of driving with an expired motor vehicle registration if the defendant:

(A) remedies the defect not later than the 20th working day after the date of the offense or before the defendant's first court appearance date, whichever is later; and

(B) establishes that the fee prescribed by Section 502.045 has been paid; and

(2) assess a reimbursement fee not to exceed $20 when the charge is dismissed.

Text of subsection effective on January 01, 2025

(b-1) For purposes of dismissing a charge under Subsection (b), "day" does not include Saturday, Sunday, or a legal holiday.

(c) It is a defense to prosecution under this section that at the time of the offense:

(1) the office of the county assessor-collector for the county in which the owner of the vehicle resided was closed for a protracted period of time in accordance with department rules; and

(2) the vehicle's registration was expired for 30 working days or less.

Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 207, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1027 (H.B. 1623), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 247(6), eff. January 1, 2012.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 20.012, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1292 (H.B. 2835), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1352 (S.B. 346), Sec. 2.62, eff. January 1, 2020.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 592 (S.B. 876), Sec. 7, eff. March 1, 2022.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 919 (S.B. 1923), Sec. 10, eff. September 1, 2021.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 1.003, eff. January 1, 2025.

Sec. 502.410. FALSIFICATION OR FORGERY. (a) A person commits an offense if the person knowingly provides false or incorrect information or without legal authority signs the name of another person on a statement or application filed or given as required by this chapter.

Text of subsection effective until July 01, 2025

(b) Subsection (a) does not apply to a statement or application filed or given under Section 502.060, 502.092, 502.093, 502.094, 502.095, 504.201, 504.202(b-1), 504.508, or 504.515.

Text of subsection effective on July 01, 2025

(b) Subsection (a) does not apply to a statement or application filed or given under Section 502.060, 502.093, 502.094, 502.095, 504.201, 504.202(b-1), 504.508, or 504.515.

(c) An offense under this section is a felony of the third degree.

Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 30.67(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 728 (H.B. 2018), Sec. 20.003(b), eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 20.013, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 92 (S.B. 792), Sec. 1, eff. January 1, 2022.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 668 (H.B. 718), Sec. 8, eff. July 1, 2025.

Sec. 502.411. BRIBERY OF COUNTY OFFICER OR AGENT. (a) A person commits an offense if the person directly or indirectly agrees with the commissioners court of a county or an officer or agent of the commissioners court or county that the person will register or cause to be registered a motor vehicle, trailer, or semitrailer in that county in consideration of:

(1) the use by the county of the funds derived from the registration in the purchase of property; or

(2) an act to be performed by the commissioners court or an agent or officer of the commissioners court or the county.

(b) The registration of each separate vehicle in violation of Subsection (a) is a separate offense. The agreement or conspiracy to register is a separate offense.

(c) A person who makes or seeks to make an agreement prohibited by Subsection (a) shall be restrained by injunction on application by the district or county attorney of the county in which the vehicle is registered or the attorney general.

(d) An offense under this section is punishable in the same manner as an offense under Section 36.02, Penal Code.

Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 502.412. OPERATION OF VEHICLE AT WEIGHT GREATER THAN STATED IN REGISTRATION APPLICATION. (a) A person commits an offense if the person operates, or permits to be operated, a motor vehicle registered under this chapter that has a weight greater than that stated in the person's application for registration. Each use of the vehicle is a separate offense.

(b) Venue for a prosecution under this section is in any county in which the motor vehicle is operated with a gross weight greater than that stated in the person's application for registration.

(c) Repealed by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296, Sec. 247(7), eff. January 1, 2012.

Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 247(7), eff. January 1, 2012.

Sec. 502.413. VOLUNTARY CONTRIBUTION TO SPECIAL OLYMPICS TEXAS FUND. (a) When a person registers or renews the registration of a motor vehicle under this chapter, the person may contribute any amount to the Special Olympics Texas fund under Subsection (f).

(b) The department shall provide, in a conspicuous manner, an opportunity to contribute to the Special Olympics Texas fund in any registration renewal system used by the department.

(c) If a person makes a contribution under this section and does not pay the full amount of a registration fee, the county assessor-collector may credit all or a portion of the contribution to the person's registration fee.

(d) The county assessor-collector shall send any contribution made under this section to the comptroller for deposit to the Special Olympics Texas fund before the 31st day after the date the contribution is made.

(e) The department shall consult with the Department of Aging and Disability Services in performing the department's duties under this section.

(f) The Special Olympics Texas fund is created as a trust fund outside the state treasury to be held by the comptroller and administered by the Department of Aging and Disability Services as trustee on behalf of Special Olympics Texas. The fund is composed of money deposited to the credit of the fund under this section. Money in the fund shall be disbursed at least monthly, without appropriation, to Special Olympics Texas to provide training and athletic competitions for persons with mental illness and intellectual disabilities.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 109 (S.B. 272), Sec. 1, eff. January 1, 2016.

Sec. 502.414. VOLUNTARY CONTRIBUTION FOR EVIDENCE TESTING GRANT PROGRAM. (a) When a person registers or renews the registration of a motor vehicle under this chapter, the person may contribute any amount to the evidence testing grant program established under Section 772.00715, Government Code.

(b) The department shall provide, in a conspicuous manner, an opportunity to contribute to the evidence testing grant program in any registration renewal system used by the department.

(c) If a person makes a contribution under this section and does not pay the full amount of a registration fee, the county assessor-collector may credit all or a portion of the contribution to the person's registration fee.

(d) The county assessor-collector shall send any contribution made under this section to the comptroller for deposit to the credit of the evidence testing account established under Section 772.00716, Government Code, at least once every three months. Before sending the money to the comptroller, the department may deduct money equal to the amount of reasonable expenses for administering this section.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1109 (H.B. 4102), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 502.415. VOLUNTARY CONTRIBUTION TO ENDING HOMELESSNESS FUND. (a) When a person registers or renews the registration of a motor vehicle under this chapter, the person may contribute any amount to the Ending Homelessness fund under Subsection (f).

(b) The department shall provide, in a conspicuous manner, an opportunity to contribute to the Ending Homelessness fund in any registration renewal system used by the department.

(c) If a person makes a contribution under this section and does not pay the full amount of a registration fee, the county assessor-collector may credit all or a portion of the contribution to the person's registration fee.

(d) The county assessor-collector shall send any contribution made under this section to the comptroller for deposit to the Ending Homelessness fund before the 31st day after the date the contribution is made.

(e) The department shall consult with the Texas Department of Housing and Community Affairs in performing the department's duties under this section.

(f) The Ending Homelessness fund is created as a trust fund outside the state treasury to be held by the comptroller and administered by the Texas Department of Housing and Community Affairs as trustee. The fund is composed of money deposited to the credit of the fund under this section. Money in the fund shall be used to provide grants to counties and municipalities to combat homelessness.

(g) The Texas Department of Housing and Community Affairs shall adopt rules governing application for grants from the Ending Homelessness fund and the issuance of those grants.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1109 (H.B. 4102), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 502.416. VOLUNTARY CONTRIBUTION FOR TRAFFICKED PERSONS PROGRAM ACCOUNT. (a) When a person registers or renews the registration of a motor vehicle under this chapter, the department shall, in a conspicuous manner, direct that person to the opportunity to donate to the trafficked persons program account established under Section 50.0153, Health and Safety Code, through the state's electronic Internet portal described by Section 2054.252(h), Government Code.

(b) If a person makes a contribution under this section and does not pay the full amount of a registration fee, the county assessor-collector may credit all or a portion of the contribution to the person's registration fee.

(c) The department may deduct from the donations made under this section an amount equal to the department's reasonable expenses associated with administering this section.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 704 (H.B. 2633), Sec. 8, eff. September 1, 2021.

SUBCHAPTER I. ALTERNATE REGISTRATION FEES

Sec. 502.431. FEE: MOTOR VEHICLE USED EXCLUSIVELY TO TRANSPORT AND SPREAD FERTILIZER. The fee for a registration year for registration of a motor vehicle designed or modified and used exclusively to transport to the field and spread fertilizer, including agricultural limestone, is $75.

Transferred and redesignated from Transportation Code, Section 502.164 by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 141, eff. January 1, 2012.

Sec. 502.432. VEHICLE TRANSPORTING SEASONAL AGRICULTURAL PRODUCTS. (a) The department shall provide for a monthly registration period for a truck-tractor or a commercial motor vehicle:

(1) that is used exclusively to transport a seasonal agricultural product;

(2) that would otherwise be registered for a vehicle registration year; and

(3) for which the owner can show proof of payment of the heavy vehicle use tax or exemption.

(b) The department shall prescribe a registration receipt that is valid until the expiration of the designated registration period.

(c) The registration fee for a registration under this section is computed at a rate of one-twelfth the annual registration fee under Section 502.253, 502.255, or 502.433, as applicable, multiplied by the number of months in the registration period specified in the application for the registration, which may not be less than one month or longer than six months.

(d) For purposes of this section, "to transport a seasonal agricultural product" includes any transportation activity necessary for the production, harvest, or delivery of an agricultural product that is produced seasonally.

Transferred, redesignated and amended from Transportation Code, Section 502.1586 by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 142, eff. January 1, 2012.

Sec. 502.433. FEE: COMMERCIAL FARM MOTOR VEHICLE. (a) The registration fee for a commercial motor vehicle as a farm vehicle is 50 percent of the applicable fee under Section 502.252 or 502.253, as applicable, if the vehicle's owner will use the vehicle for commercial purposes only to transport:

(1) the person's own poultry, dairy, livestock, livestock products, timber in its natural state, or farm products to market or another place for sale or processing;

(2) laborers from their place of residence to the owner's farm or ranch; or

(3) without charge, materials, tools, equipment, or supplies from the place of purchase or storage to the owner's farm or ranch exclusively for the owner's use or for use on the farm or ranch.

(a-1) A commercial motor vehicle registration may not be issued or renewed under this section unless the vehicle's owner provides a registration number issued by the comptroller under Section 151.1551, Tax Code. The comptroller shall allow access to the online system established under Section 151.1551(l), Tax Code, to verify a registration number provided under this subsection.

(b) A commercial motor vehicle may be registered under this section despite its use for transporting without charge the owner or a member of the owner's family:

(1) to attend church or school;

(2) to visit a doctor for medical treatment or supplies;

(3) for other necessities of the home or family; or

(4) for the purpose of participating in equine activities or attending livestock shows, as defined by Section 87.001, Civil Practice and Remedies Code.

(c) Subsection (b) does not permit the use of a vehicle registered under this section in connection with gainful employment other than farming or ranching.

(d) The department shall provide distinguishing license plates for a vehicle registered under this section.

Transferred, redesignated and amended from Transportation Code, Section 502.163 by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 143, eff. January 1, 2012.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1068 (H.B. 3256), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1135 (H.B. 2741), Sec. 72, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 968 (S.B. 2075), Sec. 11, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 502.434. FARM VEHICLES: EXCESS WEIGHT. (a) The owner of a registered commercial motor vehicle, truck-tractor, trailer, or semitrailer may obtain a short-term permit to haul loads of a weight more than that for which the vehicle is registered by paying an additional fee before the additional weight is hauled to transport:

(1) the person's own seasonal agricultural products to market or another point for sale or processing;

(2) seasonal laborers from their place of residence to a farm or ranch; or

(3) materials, tools, equipment, or supplies, without charge, from the place of purchase or storage to a farm or ranch exclusively for use on the farm or ranch.

(a-1) A permit may not be issued under this section unless the vehicle's owner provides a registration number issued by the comptroller under Section 151.1551, Tax Code. The comptroller shall allow access to the online system established under Section 151.1551(l), Tax Code, to verify a registration number provided under this subsection. This subsection does not apply to a permit issued to a retail dealer of tools or equipment that is transporting the tools or equipment from the place of purchase or storage to the customer's farm or ranch.

(b) A permit may not be issued under this section for a period that is less than one month or that:

(1) is greater than one year; or

(2) extends beyond the expiration of the registration year for the vehicle.

(c) A permit issued under this section for a quarter must be for a calendar quarter.

(d) The fee for a permit under this section is a percentage of the difference between the registration fee otherwise prescribed for the vehicle and the annual fee for the desired weight, as follows:

One month (30 consecutive days) 10 percent

One quarter 30 percent

Two quarters 60 percent

Three quarters 90 percent

(e) The department shall design, prescribe, and furnish a sticker, plate, or other means of indicating the additional weight and the registration period for each vehicle registered under this section.

Transferred, redesignated and amended from Transportation Code, Section 502.351 by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 144, eff. January 1, 2012.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1068 (H.B. 3256), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 502.435. CERTAIN SOIL CONSERVATION EQUIPMENT. (a) The owner of a truck-tractor, semitrailer, or low-boy trailer used on a highway exclusively to transport the owner's soil conservation machinery or equipment used in clearing real property, terracing, or building farm ponds, levees, or ditches may register the vehicle for a fee equal to 50 percent of the fee otherwise prescribed by this chapter for the vehicle.

(b) An owner may register only one truck-tractor and only one semitrailer or low-boy trailer under this section.

(c) An owner must certify that the vehicle is to be used only as provided by Subsection (a).

(d) The registration receipt issued for a vehicle registered under this section must be carried in or on the vehicle and state the nature of the operation for which the vehicle may be used.

(e) A vehicle to which this section applies that is operated on a public highway in violation of this section is considered to be operated while unregistered and is immediately subject to the applicable registration fees and penalties prescribed by this chapter.

Transferred, redesignated and amended from Transportation Code, Section 502.188 by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 145, eff. January 1, 2012.

SUBCHAPTER J. REGISTRATIONS EXEMPT FROM FEES

Sec. 502.451. EXEMPT VEHICLES. (a) Before license plates are issued or delivered to the owner of a vehicle that is exempt by law from payment of registration fees, the department must approve the application for registration. The department may not approve an application if there is the appearance that:

(1) the vehicle was transferred to the owner or purported owner:

(A) for the sole purpose of evading the payment of registration fees; or

(B) in bad faith; or

(2) the vehicle is not being used in accordance with the exemption requirements.

(b) The department shall revoke the registration of a vehicle issued license plates under this section and may recall the plates if the vehicle is no longer:

(1) owned and operated by the person whose ownership of the vehicle qualified the vehicle for the exemption; or

(2) used in accordance with the exemption requirements.

(c) The department shall provide by rule for the issuance of specially designated license plates for vehicles that are exempt by law. Except as provided by Subsection (f), the license plates must bear the word "exempt."

(d) A license plate under Subsection (c) is not issued annually, but remains on the vehicle until:

(1) the registration is revoked as provided by Subsection (b); or

(2) the plate is lost, stolen, or mutilated.

(e) A person who operates on a public highway a vehicle after the registration has been revoked is liable for the penalties for failing to register a vehicle.

(f) The department shall provide by rule for the issuance of regularly designed license plates not bearing the word "exempt" for a vehicle that is exempt by law and that is:

(1) a law enforcement vehicle, if the agency certifies to the department that the vehicle will be dedicated to law enforcement activities;

(2) a vehicle exempt from inscription requirements under a rule adopted as provided by Section 721.003; or

(3) a vehicle exempt from inscription requirements under an order or ordinance adopted by a governing body of a municipality or commissioners court of a county as provided by Section 721.005, if the applicant presents a copy of the order or ordinance.

Transferred, redesignated and amended from Transportation Code, Section 502.201 by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 147, eff. January 1, 2012.

Sec. 502.452. LIMITATION ON ISSUANCE OF EXEMPT LICENSE PLATES; SEIZURE OF CERTAIN VEHICLES. (a) The department may not issue exempt license plates for a vehicle owned by the United States, this state, or a political subdivision of this state unless when application is made for registration of the vehicle, the person who under Section 502.453 has authority to certify to the department that the vehicle qualifies for registration under that section also certifies in writing to the department that there is printed on each side of the vehicle, in letters that are at least two inches high or in an emblem that is at least 100 square inches in size, the name of the agency, department, bureau, board, commission, or officer of the United States, this state, or the political subdivision of this state that has custody of the vehicle. The letters or emblem must be of a color sufficiently different from the body of the vehicle to be clearly legible from a distance of 100 feet.

(b) The department may not issue exempt license plates for a vehicle owned by a person other than the United States, this state, or a political subdivision of this state unless, when application is made for registration of the vehicle, the person who under Section 502.453 has authority to certify to the department that the vehicle qualifies for registration under that section also certifies in writing to the department that the name of the owner of the vehicle is printed on the vehicle in the manner prescribed by Subsection (a).

Text of subsection effective until January 01, 2025

(c) A peace officer listed in Article 2.12, Code of Criminal Procedure, may seize a motor vehicle displaying exempt license plates if the vehicle is:

(1) operated on a public highway; and

(2) not identified in the manner prescribed by Subsection (a) or (b), unless the vehicle is covered by Subsection (f).

Text of subsection effective on January 01, 2025

(c) A peace officer listed in Article 2A.001, Code of Criminal Procedure, may seize a motor vehicle displaying exempt license plates if the vehicle is:

(1) operated on a public highway; and

(2) not identified in the manner prescribed by Subsection (a) or (b), unless the vehicle is covered by Subsection (f).

(d) A peace officer who seizes a motor vehicle under Subsection (c) may require that the vehicle be:

(1) moved to the nearest place of safety off the main-traveled part of the highway; or

(2) removed and placed in the nearest vehicle storage facility designated or maintained by the law enforcement agency that employs the peace officer.

(e) To obtain the release of the vehicle, in addition to any other requirement of law, the owner of a vehicle seized under Subsection (c) must:

(1) remedy the defect by identifying the vehicle as required by Subsection (a) or (b); or

(2) agree in writing with the law enforcement agency to provide evidence to that agency, before the 10th day after the date the vehicle is released, that the defect has been remedied by identifying the vehicle as required by Subsection (a) or (b).

(f) Subsections (a) and (b) do not apply to a vehicle to which Section 502.451(f) applies.

(g) For purposes of this section, an exempt license plate is a license plate issued by the department that is plainly marked with the word "exempt."

Transferred, redesignated and amended from Transportation Code, Section 502.2015 by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 148, eff. January 1, 2012.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 2.166, eff. January 1, 2025.

Sec. 502.453. GOVERNMENT-OWNED VEHICLES; PUBLIC SCHOOL BUSES; FIRE-FIGHTING VEHICLES; COUNTY MARINE LAW ENFORCEMENT VEHICLES; U.S. COAST GUARD AUXILIARY VEHICLES. (a) The owner of a motor vehicle, trailer, or semitrailer may apply for registration under Section 502.0025 or 502.451 and is exempt from the payment of a registration fee under this chapter if the vehicle is:

(1) owned by and used exclusively in the service of:

(A) the United States;

(B) this state;

(C) a county, municipality, or school district in this state; or

(D) an open-enrollment charter school;

(2) owned by a commercial transportation company and used exclusively to provide public school transportation services to a school district under Section 34.008, Education Code;

(3) designed and used exclusively for fire fighting;

(4) owned by a volunteer fire department and used exclusively in the conduct of department business;

(5) privately owned and used by a volunteer exclusively in county marine law enforcement activities, including rescue operations, under the direction of the sheriff's department;

(6) used by law enforcement under an alias for covert criminal investigations; or

(7) owned by units of the United States Coast Guard Auxiliary headquartered in Texas and used exclusively for conduct of United States Coast Guard or Coast Guard Auxiliary business and operations, including search and rescue, emergency communications, and disaster operations.

(b) An application for registration under this section or Section 502.0025 must be made by a person having the authority to certify that the vehicle meets the exemption requirements prescribed by Subsection (a). An application for registration under this section of a fire-fighting vehicle described by Subsection (a)(3) must include a reasonable description of the vehicle and of any fire-fighting equipment mounted on the vehicle. An application for registration under this section of a vehicle described by Subsection (a)(5) must include a statement signed by a person having the authority to act for a sheriff's department that the vehicle is used exclusively in marine law enforcement activities under the direction of the sheriff's department. An application for registration under this section of a vehicle described by Subsection (a)(7) must include a statement signed by a person having authority to act for the United States Coast Guard Auxiliary that the vehicle or trailer is used exclusively in fulfillment of an authorized mission of the United States Coast Guard or Coast Guard Auxiliary, including search and rescue, patrol, emergency communications, or disaster operations.

Transferred, redesignated and amended from Transportation Code, Section 502.202 by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 149, eff. January 1, 2012.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 726 (H.B. 1360), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2015.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 989 (H.B. 897), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 56 (S.B. 1064), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 502.454. VEHICLES USED BY NONPROFIT DISASTER RELIEF ORGANIZATIONS. (a) The owner of a commercial motor vehicle, trailer, or semitrailer may apply for registration under Section 502.451 and is exempt from the payment of the registration fee that would otherwise be required by this chapter if the vehicle is:

(1) owned by a nonprofit disaster relief organization; and

(2) used by the organization exclusively for emergencies, training, equipment maintenance, transportation of disaster relief supplies, or other activities related to disaster relief.

(b) An application for registration under this section must include:

(1) a statement by the owner of the vehicle that the vehicle is used exclusively as described by Subsection (a) and has not been used for any other purpose;

(2) a statement signed by an officer of the nonprofit disaster relief organization that the vehicle has been used exclusively as described by Subsection (a) and qualifies for registration under this section; and

(3) a reasonable description of the vehicle and the emergency equipment included in the vehicle.

(c) An applicant for registration under this section must pay a fee of $5.

(d) A commercial motor vehicle registered under this section must display the name of the organization that owns it on each front door.

(e) A vehicle registered under this section must display at all times an appropriate license plate showing the vehicle's status.

(f) A vehicle registered under this section that is used other than as described by Subsection (a) may not again be registered under this section.

Transferred, redesignated and amended from Transportation Code, Section 502.203 by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 150, eff. January 1, 2012.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 657 (H.B. 53), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 502.455. TRAILERS AND SEMITRAILERS OWNED BY RELIGIOUS ORGANIZATIONS. (a) A trailer or semitrailer may be registered without payment if the trailer or semitrailer is:

(1) owned by an organization that qualifies as a religious organization under Section 11.20, Tax Code; and

(2) used primarily for the purpose of transporting property in connection with the charitable activities and functions of the organization.

(b) An application for registration under this section must include a statement signed by an officer of the religious organization stating that the trailer or semitrailer qualifies for registration under this section.

Transferred and redesignated from Transportation Code, Section 502.2035 by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 151, eff. January 1, 2012.

Sec. 502.456. EMERGENCY SERVICES VEHICLES. (a) A vehicle may be registered without payment if:

(1) the vehicle is owned or leased by an emergency medical services provider that:

(A) is a nonprofit entity; or

(B) is created and operated by:

(i) a county;

(ii) a municipality; or

(iii) any combination of counties and municipalities through a contract, joint agreement, or other method provided by Chapter 791, Government Code, or other law authorizing counties and municipalities to provide joint programs; and

(2) the vehicle:

(A) is authorized under an emergency medical services provider license issued by the Department of State Health Services under Chapter 773, Health and Safety Code, and is used exclusively as an emergency medical services vehicle; or

(B) is an emergency medical services chief or supervisor vehicle and is used exclusively as an emergency services vehicle.

(b) A vehicle may be registered without payment of a registration fee if the vehicle:

(1) is owned by the Civil Air Patrol, Texas Wing; and

(2) is used exclusively as an emergency services vehicle by members of the Civil Air Patrol, Texas Wing.

(c) An application for registration under Subsection (a) must be accompanied by a copy of the license issued by the Department of State Health Services. An application for registration of an emergency medical services vehicle must include a statement signed by an officer of the emergency medical services provider that the vehicle is used exclusively as an emergency response vehicle and qualifies for registration under this section. An application for registration of an emergency medical services chief or supervisor vehicle must include a statement signed by an officer of the emergency medical services provider stating that the vehicle qualifies for registration under this section.

(d) An application for registration under Subsection (b) must include a statement signed by an officer of the Civil Air Patrol, Texas Wing, that the vehicle is used exclusively as an emergency services vehicle by members of the Civil Air Patrol, Texas Wing.

(e) The department must approve an application for registration under this section as provided by Section 502.451.

Transferred, redesignated and amended from Transportation Code, Section 502.204 by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 152, eff. January 1, 2012.

Sec. 502.457. PERSONS ON ACTIVE DUTY IN ARMED FORCES OF UNITED STATES. (a) This section applies only to a used motor vehicle that is owned by a person who:

(1) is on active duty in the armed forces of the United States;

(2) is stationed in or has been assigned to another nation under military orders; and

(3) has registered the vehicle or been issued a license for the vehicle under the applicable status of forces agreement by:

(A) the appropriate branch of the armed forces of the United States; or

(B) the nation in which the person is stationed or to which the person has been assigned.

(b) The requirement that a used vehicle be registered under the law of this state does not apply to a vehicle described by Subsection (a). In lieu of delivering the license receipt to the transferee of the vehicle, as required by Section 501.0721, the person selling, trading, or otherwise transferring a used motor vehicle described by Subsection (a) shall deliver to the transferee:

(1) a letter written on official letterhead by the owner's unit commander attesting to the registration of the vehicle under Subsection (a)(3); or

(2) the registration receipt issued by the appropriate branch of the armed forces or host nation.

(c) A registration receipt issued by a host nation that is not written in the English language must be accompanied by:

(1) a written translation of the registration receipt in English; and

(2) an affidavit, in English and signed by the person translating the registration receipt, attesting to the person's ability to translate the registration receipt into English.

Transferred, redesignated and amended from Transportation Code, Section 520.0225 by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 153, eff. January 1, 2012.

Sec. 502.458. VEHICLES USED BY NONPROFIT FOOD BANKS. (a) In this section, "nonprofit food bank" has the meaning assigned by Section 162.001, Tax Code.

(b) The owner of a motor vehicle described by Section 162.104(a)(10)(A) or 162.204(a)(16)(A), Tax Code, may apply for registration under Section 502.451 of this code and is exempt from the payment of the registration fee that would otherwise be required by this chapter if the vehicle is used by a nonprofit food bank to deliver food.

(c) An application for registration under this section must include:

(1) a statement by the owner of the vehicle that the vehicle is used by a nonprofit food bank to deliver food; and

(2) a statement signed by an officer of the nonprofit food bank that the vehicle has been used by a nonprofit food bank to deliver food and qualifies for registration under this section.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 536 (H.B. 3599), Sec. 8, eff. September 1, 2023.

SUBCHAPTER K. OFFENSES AND PENALTIES

Sec. 502.471. GENERAL PENALTY. (a) A person commits an offense if the person violates a provision of this chapter and no other penalty is prescribed for the violation.

(b) This section does not apply to a violation of Section 502.003, 502.042, 502.197, or 502.431.

(c) Unless otherwise specified, an offense under this section is a misdemeanor punishable by a fine not to exceed $200.

Transferred, redesignated and amended from Transportation Code, Section 502.401 by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 155, eff. January 1, 2012.

Sec. 502.472. OPERATION OF VEHICLE UNDER IMPROPER REGISTRATION. A person commits an offense if the person operates a motor vehicle that has not been registered or registered for a class other than that to which the vehicle belongs as required by law.

Transferred, redesignated and amended from Transportation Code, Section 502.402 by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 156, eff. January 1, 2012.

Sec. 502.473. OPERATION OF VEHICLE WITHOUT REGISTRATION INSIGNIA. (a) A person commits an offense if the person operates on a public highway during a registration period a motor vehicle that does not properly display the registration insignia issued by the department that establishes that the license plates have been validated for the period.

(b) A person commits an offense if the person operates on a public highway during a registration period a road tractor, motorcycle, trailer, or semitrailer that does not display a registration insignia issued by the department that establishes that the vehicle is registered for the period.

(c) This section does not apply to a dealer operating a vehicle as provided by law.

(d) A court may dismiss a charge brought under Subsection (a) if the defendant pays a reimbursement fee not to exceed $10 and:

(1) remedies the defect before the defendant's first court appearance; or

(2) shows that the motor vehicle was issued a registration insignia by the department that was attached to the motor vehicle, establishing that the vehicle was registered for the period during which the offense was committed.

Transferred, redesignated and amended from Transportation Code, Section 502.404 by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 157, eff. January 1, 2012.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1135 (H.B. 2741), Sec. 73, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1352 (S.B. 346), Sec. 2.63, eff. January 1, 2020.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 919 (S.B. 1923), Sec. 11, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 502.474. OPERATION OF ONE-TRIP PERMIT VEHICLE. A person commits an offense if the person operates a vehicle for which a one-trip permit is required without the registration receipt and properly displayed temporary tag.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 158, eff. January 1, 2012.

Sec. 502.475. WRONG, FICTITIOUS, ALTERED, OR OBSCURED INSIGNIA. (a) A person commits an offense if the person attaches to or displays on a motor vehicle a registration insignia that:

(1) is assigned to a different motor vehicle;

(2) is assigned to the vehicle under any other motor vehicle law other than by the department;

(3) is assigned for a registration period other than the registration period in effect; or

(4) is fictitious.

(b) Except as provided by Subsection (d), an offense under Subsection (a) is a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than $200, unless it is shown at the trial of the offense that the owner knowingly altered or made illegible the letters, numbers, and other identification marks, in which case the offense is a Class B misdemeanor.

(c) A court may dismiss a charge brought under Subsection (a)(3) if the defendant:

(1) remedies the defect before the defendant's first court appearance; and

(2) pays a reimbursement fee not to exceed $10.

(d) An offense under Subsection (a)(4) is a Class B misdemeanor.

Transferred, redesignated and amended from Transportation Code, Section 502.409 by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 159, eff. January 1, 2012.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1352 (S.B. 346), Sec. 2.64, eff. January 1, 2020.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 919 (S.B. 1923), Sec. 12, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 502.4755. DECEPTIVELY SIMILAR INSIGNIA. (a) A person commits an offense if the person:

(1) manufactures, sells, or possesses a registration insignia deceptively similar to the registration insignia of the department; or

(2) makes a copy or likeness of an insignia deceptively similar to the registration insignia of the department with intent to sell the copy or likeness.

(b) For the purposes of this section, an insignia is deceptively similar to the registration insignia of the department if the insignia is not prescribed by the department but a reasonable person would presume that it was prescribed by the department.

(c) A district or county court, on application of the attorney general or of the district attorney or prosecuting attorney performing the duties of the district attorney for the district in which the court is located, may enjoin a violation or threatened violation of this section on a showing that a violation has occurred or is likely to occur.

(d) It is an affirmative defense to a prosecution under this section that the insignia was produced pursuant to a licensing agreement with the department.

(e) An offense under this section is:

(1) a felony of the third degree if the person manufactures or sells a deceptively similar registration insignia; or

(2) a Class C misdemeanor if the person possesses a deceptively similar registration insignia, except that the offense is a Class B misdemeanor if the person has previously been convicted of an offense under this subdivision.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1135 (H.B. 2741), Sec. 74, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 502.476. ANNUAL PERMITS; OFFENSE. A person who violates Section 502.093 commits an offense.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 160, eff. January 1, 2012.

Text of section effective until July 01, 2025

Sec. 502.477. NONRESIDENT-OWNED VEHICLES USED TO TRANSPORT AGRICULTURAL PRODUCT; OFFENSE. (a) A person operating a vehicle under a permit issued under Section 502.092 commits an offense if the person transports farm products to a place of market, storage, or processing or a railhead or seaport that is farther from the place of production or point of entry, as appropriate, than the distance provided for in the permit.

(b) An offense under this section is a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not less than $25 or more than $200.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 160, eff. January 1, 2012.

Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 668 (H.B. 718), Sec. 32(2), eff. July 1, 2025.

Sec. 502.478. COMMERCIAL MOTOR VEHICLE USED PRIMARILY FOR AGRICULTURAL PURPOSES; OFFENSE. (a) The owner of a commercial motor vehicle registered under Section 502.433 commits an offense if the person uses or permits the use of the vehicle for a purpose other than one allowed under Section 502.433. Each use or permission of use in violation of this section is a separate offense.

(b) An offense under this section is a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not less than $25 or more than $200.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 160, eff. January 1, 2012.

Sec. 502.479. SEASONAL AGRICULTURAL VEHICLE; OFFENSE. A person issued a registration under Section 502.432 commits an offense if the person, during the registration period, uses the truck-tractor or commercial motor vehicle for a purpose other than to transport a seasonal agricultural product.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 160, eff. January 1, 2012.

Sec. 502.480. VIOLATION BY COUNTY ASSESSOR-COLLECTOR; PENALTY. (a) A county assessor-collector commits an offense if the county assessor-collector knowingly accepts an application for the registration of a motor vehicle that:

(1) has had the original motor number or vehicle identification number removed, erased, or destroyed; and

(2) does not bear a motor number or vehicle identification number assigned by the department.

(b) An offense under this section is a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not less than $10 and not more than $50.

Transferred, redesignated and amended from Transportation Code, Section 520.014 by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 161, eff. January 1, 2012.

SUBCHAPTER L. REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER OF USED VEHICLES

Sec. 502.491. TRANSFER OF VEHICLE REGISTRATION. (a) On the sale or transfer of a vehicle, the registration insignia issued for the vehicle shall be removed. The registration period remaining at the time of sale or transfer expires at the time of sale or transfer.

(b) On a sale or transfer of a vehicle in which neither party holds a general distinguishing number issued under Chapter 503, the part of the registration period remaining at the time of the sale or transfer shall continue with the vehicle being sold or transferred and does not transfer with the license plates or registration validation insignia. To continue the remainder of the registration period, the purchaser or transferee must file the documents required under Section 501.145.

(c) On the sale or transfer of a vehicle to a dealer, as defined by Section 503.001, who holds a general distinguishing number issued under Chapter 503, the registration period remaining at the time of the sale or transfer expires at the time of the sale or transfer. On the sale of a used vehicle by a dealer, the dealer shall issue to the buyer new registration documents for an entire registration year.

(d) If the transferor has paid for more than one year of registration, the department may credit the transferor for any time remaining on the registration in annual increments.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 101 (H.B. 310), Sec. 2, eff. January 1, 2008.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 432 (S.B. 1057), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2011.

Transferred, redesignated and amended from Transportation Code, Section 502.451 by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 163, eff. January 1, 2012.

Reenacted and amended by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 20.014, eff. September 1, 2013.

Reenacted and amended by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1135 (H.B. 2741), Sec. 75, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 502.492. TEMPORARY TRANSIT PERMIT FOR A VEHICLE PURCHASED. (a) A purchaser may obtain from the department a temporary transit permit to operate a motor vehicle:

(1) that is subject to registration in this state;

(2) from which the license plates and the registration insignia have been removed as authorized by Section 502.491 or 504.901; and

(3) that is not authorized to travel on a public roadway because the required license plates and the registration insignia are not attached to the vehicle.

(b) The department may issue the permit in accordance with this section.

(c) A permit issued under this section is valid for one trip between the point of origin and the destination and those intermediate points specified in the permit.

(d) A permit issued under this section may not be valid for longer than a five-day period.

(e) A person may obtain a permit under this section by applying, as provided by the department, to the department. Application may be made using the department's Internet website.

(f) A person is eligible to receive only one permit under this section for a motor vehicle.

(g) A permit receipt issued under this section must be in a manner provided by the department. The receipt must contain the information required by this section and shall be carried in the vehicle at all times during which it is valid.

(h) The department may refuse to issue a permit under this section for any vehicle if in the department's opinion the applicant has been involved in operations that constitute an abuse of the privilege granted under this section.

Transferred, redesignated and amended from Transportation Code, Section 502.454 by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 164, eff. January 1, 2012.